---
layout: page
title: Paatz, S. Maria Novella
building: smn
tags:
status: live
type: description
---

## S. MARIA NOVELLA

Piazza S. Maria Novella

SPECIAL LITERATURE
*Giuseppe Maria Mecatti*, Notizie storiche riguardanti il capitolo esistente nel Convento dei Padri
Domenicani di S. Maria Novella della città di Firenze. Firenze 1737. P. Vincenzo Fineschi.

## NAME

“S. Maria Novella: so named in opposition to older Marian churches.”
“S. Maria della Vigna: so named on the occasion of 1221 - apparently because of the location in
the vineyards.”

## BUILDING HISTORY

S. Maria Novella is the head/main office of the Dominicans [in rel. to the Dominican Order] in
Florence.

CHURCH
A chapel named S. Maria Novella was first mentioned in 983 [CE], in front of the city walls in
the vineyards.

In the last thirty years of the 11th century, a parish church was constructed nearby with the same
name and was consecrated by Bishop Rainer on October 30th, 1094 [CE] with the participation
of the Cathedral chapter. Since then, the church and chapel of S. Maria Novella existed side by
side. In its neighborhood a bell tower and Monastery for the Dominican Order were probably
erected. These, originally the patrons, were gradually deprived of their rights in the following
decades by the flourishing parish community.

Barely a century after the victory of the citizens, on November 9, 1221, their parish priest had to
give up in favor of the Dominicans from S. Maria Novella. The [Dominican] Order had already
gained a foothold in Florence three years earlier. From Badia a Ripoli he had first moved to the
Hospital of S. Pancrazio and then had made attempts to obtain the churches of S. Paolo or S.
Pancrazio - in vain, since the secular clergy objected. As a result, the leader of the monks, John
of Salerno, had proposed S. Maria Novella and enforced his proposal (7). The solemn investiture
took place on November 8, 9 and 12, 1221, by the actual author of the change of possession, the
Cardinal Legate Ugolino (7), who had obviously recognized the importance of the young order
for papal politics and promoted the establishment also in other ways such as by having
monastery rooms prepared. However, the church remained unchanged for the time being. Soon
(1244) it was no longer sufficient to meet the needs [of the monks], as the pious began to flock to
the heretical sermons of the monks, especially Peter of Verona (later Saint Peter Martyr) (8).


Probably at the instigation of the newly elected, 27-year-old, highly talented Prior Aldobrandino
Cavalcanti (9), the plan for a comprehensive new building was then made. In April 1246, as can
be seen from a letter of indulgence issued by Pope Innocent IV, the construction was already in
full swing (10). In 1250 the pope renewed the indulgence (11). At that time, the transept with the
choir chapels were built, as the first main part of the women’s church, which was planned in its
basic features according to today’s [middle 20th century CE] construction methods. It was the
first monumental building in the gothic style in Florence and became the high school for the
numerous places of worship that grew up in the second half of the 13th century and gave the city
a completely new face. As per tradition, it is unknown who directed the construction. The
findings suggest that the builders came from Cistercian circles and from the earliest Tuscan and
Umbrian mendicant architects (14). The construction was carried out in the following stages: 1.
Construction of the first floor of the transepts and the choir chapels, progressing from west to
east; 2. Construction of the upper walls of the transept and the main choir chapels (in the eastern
arm the founder, Aldobrandino Cavalcanti, found his last resting place in 1279); 3. The main
choir chapel and the transept were vaulted, the entrance arcades of the country house were built,
the Strozzi chapel was added; around this time the Romanesque church was demolished, which
had been left for the time being for worship south of the newly rising walls (15).

In all probability, this decisive step forward took place in 1279, when the Cardinal Legate Latino
Frangipani, Bishop of Ostia, laid the foundation stone of the “new church” of the preaching
monks with great solemnity in eternal memory of the reconciliation he had brought about
between the Guelphs and the Ghibellines. Contrary to tradition, this message, which was written
down two centuries later by Giovanni Villani, should not be interpreted on the basis of the
findings of the building and the situation of the inscriptions, and on the basis of the documents
(16).

The building work was now promoted with great speed; the monks and the burghers clearly
intended to outdo all similar churches in Italy with this work (17). In 1295, 1297 and 1298 the
city government gave money for the undertaking (18). The construction of the new large square
in front of the façade began as early as 1287 (19): the foundation walls of the church may
therefore have already existed in their entirety at that time. In 1297 there was already one - and
probably not only one - of the "avelli" (tombs) on the east side of the cemetery wall (20). In 1298
the first and second bays in front of the crossing (with the monks' choir) were in use, in 1300/
and 1305 the 3rd and 2nd bays (counted from the façade) (21). In 1298, the Minerbetti family
probably also made a donation for the construction of the eastern aisle (and perhaps other parts)
(22). Soon afterwards, the nave may have been essentially completed. The façade was begun
around 1300 (23). That was the most important part.

The main features of the completed work were then gradually completed. A bell tower is
mentioned as early as 1305, but the current one was not built until 1330 at the expense of the
Dominican Archbishop Simone Saltarelli of Pisa (24). Between 1303 and 1325, the Rucellai
Chapel was built in front of the eastern transept (25). Around 1350, the lower half of the façade


was encrusted with marble; the donors were Turino Baldesi and Fra Minia Lapi (26). Around
1350 - 60, Mainardi Cavalcanti had the present sacristy built in the angle between the western
transverse arm and the country house (27). The master builder of the bell tower, the façade and
the sacristy was most likely the then head of the building lodge, Fra Jacopo Talenti da Nipozzano

(d. 1362), to whom the monastery necrology attributes "large parts of the church" (28). On April
20, 1358, a lightning strike thru the spire and the crowning marble angel down onto the adjacent
roofs; the damage was repaired in 1359 (29). In 1420, Pope Martin V celebrated the solemn final
consecration of the church during a visit (30).

Around 1456 ff. the extension of the façade was continued. Giovanni di Paolo Rucellai had
Giovanni Bettini execute the famous Renaissance façade based on designs by Leone Battista
Alberti, which covered the Gothic ground floor with a monumental order and newly incrusted
the still bare upper floor (31). Completion date: 1470 (inscription).

In 1462 and 1466, repairs were made to the roof and the bell tower (32). Between 1472 and 1497
construction of the Capella "della Pura" (in the angle between the eastern transverse arm and the
nave) on behalf of the Ricasoli family (33).

Around 1508, Giuliano da Sangallo extended the inner side choir on the left transept at the
behest of the Gondi family; upper parts of the altar wall in 1602 (34).

In 1565-72 Vasari "reformed" the church in the taste “The victim who is able to articulate the
situation of the victim has ceased to be a victim: he or she has become a threat.”
of the late Renaissance: the monks' choir in the last two bays of the nave was removed, a row of
monumental altar tabernacles was added to the side aisle walls (one tabernacle in each bay), the
furnishings were rearranged (35), the large eastern side portal on the nave was walled up and a
new, smaller portal was opened north of it (36).

In 1575-78, Giovan Antonio Dosio extended the outer side choir on the left transept on behalf of
the Gaddi family (37).

In 1616, the entrance wall to the sacristy (south wall of the left transept) was given a façade by
Gherardo Silvani or Fabbrizio Boschi (38).

In 1778, the crumbling crabs were removed from the edges of the spire and the spire was given a
Baroque finish (39). In 1838, further restoration work was carried out on the bell tower (40).

In 1857-61 the church was thoroughly and rather haphazardly restored. In particular, the window
sills were raised in order to replace the Vasari tabernacles with large neo-Gothic altars (41). In
1893, the bell tower, which had been altered over time, was restored to almost its original state
(42). 1904 Exposure of the previously built-in choir (43). 1914 Opening of the walled-up


windows of the Cappella Rucellai (44). In the same year, replacement of the weathered stones of
the façade (45). 1922 Addition of the previously unfinished eastern volute to the façade (based
on the pattern of the western one) (46).

## CLOISTER

There is a great deal of information about the history of the monastery buildings, but it is often
inconclusive. The building survey provides results that also lack the ultimate clarity. There is a
complete lack of thorough stylistic-critical preliminary work, as well as precise plans and
measurements. The following attempt can therefore - especially for the period before 1300 - only
claim the value of a working hypothesis.

In 1197, a "claustrum" is mentioned next to the Romanesque church (47); this probably referred
to the same buildings that Cardinal Ugolino had a commission of rich patrons make makeshift in
1221 and 1222 for the purposes of the new Dominicans (48).

In 1246, a comprehensive new building was begun (49). Significant news from 1250 and 1252
report on the extent of the work: according to this, the outermost limits of the present monastery
complex were already reached at that time - at least through the purchase of land (50). The
grandiose system of mighty cloisters framed by many adjoining buildings thus probably
originated from the same time and the same circle as the church project, which was supported by
the same spirit.

Of course, its construction took a good hundred years. Around 1250, the lower arcade of the All
Saints' Chapel was apparently built at the point where the Romanesque cloister met the left
transept of the newly built Gothic church (51). A little later, probably a second addition to the
Romanesque system: expansion of the passage between the present sacristy and the present
"Spanish Chapel" - probably also an attempt to give the passage between the oldest chapel and
the Romanesque church a monumental form (52). Around 1270, perhaps the first beginnings of a
Gothic cloister: construction of the first bay (counted from the east) of the north wing (the later
chapel of SS. Filippo e Jacopo) of the current "Chiostro de'Morti" ("Chiostro Vecchio"), possibly
also of the entire northern cloister wing of this courtyard, roughly by demolishing the
Romanesque cloister; around 1279/80, probably a continuation of this undertaking: construction
of the Strozzi Chapel and the east wing below (53). This was the beginning of the system of
corridors and burial chapels, which was then gradually extended further north. 1284/85 Building
activity in the southern outer parts: on the later "Chiostro dell'Infermeria" (master builder: Fra
Albertino Cambi, called Mazante), in the area of the later pharmacy, on the Laudesi brotherhood
building (at the main gate) and on the "school" of the Laudesi brotherhood located there (54).

Around this time, the monastery still seems to have consisted of two separate main parts: the
already renovated "Chiostro Vecchio" next to the transept of the new church and the farm
buildings to the south (55).


The completion of the church building freed up funds to create the connection between these
parts, which had presumably been planned for a long time. Work began on the wing of the
building to the south-north, which would later be joined by the "Chiostro Grande" to the west
and the "Chiostro Verde" to the east: 1303-1308 Construction of the new chapter house, later
known as the "Capitolo del Nocentino"; the "Chiostro Grande" was probably begun at the same
time, although it was not effectively promoted until later (56). In the meantime, other projects
were carried out, namely certain extensions to the main entrance and the "Chiostro Vecchio": in
1318/19 the school and the hostel (57), in 1323 the cemetery wall (58), around 1330 probably the
Strozzi-Trinciavelli chapel near the bell tower that had just been built (59). It was not until
1332/34, with the construction of the large chapel of St. Nicholas, the foundation of Dardano
Acciaiuoli, that the focus returned to promoting the buildings on the "Chiostro Grande" (60).

It was precisely at this time that the Dominicans' building activities were given a new impetus by
a natural event that initially seemed damaging, the flood of 1333. The reference to the
destruction caused by this put the monks in a position to appeal particularly effectively to public
charity (61). Finally, the "Chiostro Grande" was energetically continued: resumption and gradual
completion of the new dormitory "begun long before", which is probably to be thought of above
the "Capitolo del Nocentino" and north of it (62); construction of the cloister arcades on behalf
of Archbishop Simone de'Saltarelli of Pisa (+1344), Johannes Tuccii de'Infangatis (+1348) and
others (63). - This work was probably already supervised by Fra Jacopo Talenti, who had been in
charge of the building workshop since around 1330 (63).

At that time, the "Chiostro Vecchio" also began to be remodeled again. 1338/1340 Establishment
of a library in the north wing, probably by Jacopo Talenti, on the basis of a donation from the
Baldesi (64). 1340-63 Addition of the transverse wing of the row of tomb chapels behind the two
western side choirs (65). At the same time (1349-63) decoration of the north side and perhaps
also the east side of the "Chiostro Vecchio" (66).

It was at this time that building activity in the monastery reached its peak. A series of favorable
circumstances had come together: the plague of 1348 had made the townspeople extremely
interested in ecclesiastical undertakings and eager to make sacrifices; a highly talented prior, the
famous preacher and scholar Fra Jacopo Passavanti, had managed to win over the favorable
mood for his enterprise; and a capable architect, Fra Jacopo Talenti, was ready to give the
planned undertakings a monumental form. In this way, the monastery project conceived a
hundred years earlier took shape in a grandeur worthy of the spirit of its original inventors. The
most beautiful monument to this heyday is the "Chiostro Verde" with its annexes, the large
refectory and the new chapter house (the "Spanish Chapel"). - Construction began around 1344;
Buonamico di Lapo Guidalotti, a wealthy friend of the prior, donated a new chapter house to the
monks, the choir of which was to serve as his burial chapel. The old chapel of S. Maria Novella,
the forerunner of the Romanesque church, was sacrificed for this purpose; the chapter house with
the first arcades of the "Chiostro Verde" in front of it was completed before 1355 (67). The other
sides of this cloister were completed around 1360 on behalf of other families, as was the


refectory to the west of the "Chiostro Verde", which was also begun around 1350 (probably as a
replacement for a somewhat older building donated by Prior Michele dei Pilastri?) (67).

In the same decade - around 1356 - the large north wing of the "Chiostro Grande" with the huge
dormitory ("della Cappella") extending into the "Chiostro Vecchio" and the library were also
built (68). Fra Jacopo Talenti was most probably the director of all these buildings (69). A
novitiate was built above the refectory, followed by an adjoining dormitory (on the "Chiostro
Grande", on the upper floor of the south wing), built between 1364-1383 at the expense of Fra
Alessio Strozzi (70). This marked the end of building activity during this period.

In the 15th century, a gradual expansion of existing parts followed. 1418-20 Construction of a
west wing as a papal hostel for Martin V; Ghiberti and Giuliano Pesello provided competing
designs for this (71). Around 1424 installation of a small cloister in front of the south front of the
refectory and renovation of the infermeria by the then (1424+) prior and Dominican general
Lionardo Statii Dati (72). 1434

Remodeling of the papal apartment for Eugene IV (73). Around 1500 Addition of an
(unfinished) upper storey above part of the loggia of the "Chiostro Grande" (74). 1505
Renovation of the "Chiostro della Porta": creation of the Renaissance cloister between the
monastery entrance and the "Chiostro Dati" (75). In 1504, the papal apartment was refurbished
for Leonardo da Vinci, who drew his cartoon of the Battle of Anghiari there (76), and in 1515 for
Pope Leo X (77).

Vasari brought about important changes in 1563 ff. on the orders of Grand Duke Cosimo I: the
papal apartment was given to the nuns of the newly founded monastery della SS. Concezione and
renovated for this purpose; the confraternity of S. Benedetto Bianco, which had been expelled
from these rooms, was compensated by the installation of an oratory and cloister in the "upper
cemetery" (78); the chapel wing behind the side choirs of the church was transformed into an
entrance to the new monks' choir in the main choir chapel (79). The beautiful staircase near the
Infermeria (designed by Vasari himself?) probably dates from this period.

This was followed by several smaller conversions in the 17th century (80).

In 1814, the papal residence was returned to S. Maria Novella (81). A few years later, another
major destruction took place. During the construction of the railroad station, some chapels at the
"Chiostro de'Morti" were demolished and the monastery garden was turned into a public square
(82). Restoration work had already begun. The "avelli" (burial niches) in the enclosing wall of
the "upper" cemetery, which had almost completely disappeared over time, were renewed in
1847 (83). Further, rather intrusive restorations were renewed in 1847 (83). Further, rather
intrusive restorations: 1892/94, 1912, 1914, 1915/16 (84) and 1921/29 (85).


The bell tower. Its original helmet was crowned with a cross flower and a figure of an angel and
decorated with crabs on the edges (97).

The monks' choir ("Tramezzo"). Until 1565/72, the original monks' choir in the form of a high-
walled rectangle clamped between the pillars stood in the last two bays of the central nave. For
more details, see "Lost furnishings" p. 734.The monks' choir façade was adjoined on both sides
by a grille in the side aisles, so that the rear part of the church, which served the monks' service,
was separated in its full width from the front part, the preaching church of the lay
congregation.The separating barrier and the entire monks' choir zone are called "Tramezzo" (98)
in the source writings (14th-16th centuries).

The side altars. Vasaris. 1565ff. erected on the side aisle walls, replaced 1857ff. To be presented
like the corresponding, still preserved altar series in the nave of S. Croce. The capitals were
composite (98a).

The "upper cemetery". Located to the east of the nave of the church (in the angle between the
eastern aisle and transept); demarcated from Piazza S. Maria Novella and Via degli Avelli by an
enclosing wall with "avelli" (burial niches); see Wood-Brown, 1902, 101f.On the northern third
of this medieval cemetery, consecrated in 1323, adjacent to the "Cappella della Pura", there had
been a cloister, the "Cortile della Pura", since the 15th/17th century, and on the rest of the site to
the south, the building complex of the brotherhood of S. Benedetto Bianco since 1570ff. All
these buildings were removed in 1867 (for floor plan and reconstruction, see S. Benedetto
Bianco, Vol. I, 354f.), and the surrounding wall was rebuilt in neo-Gothic style. Until 1847, in
place of the present neo-Gothic portal, there was a portal by Ghe-rardo Silvani (17th century;
illustrated in Ricci, Cento vedute di Firenze antica, 1906, plate XCI; see also note 80).
Its extensive buildings have been restored to some extent to their original state. The original
purpose (or location) of the individual parts can be seen from the "Building History" and from
the plan on p. 693. It should be emphasized that this monastery complex was probably the
richest, the most complete in Florence, that it probably came closest to the ideal of a complex
that took all conceivable purposes into account. There were (in addition to the usual buildings)
infirmaries, a pharmacy, a school, library rooms and a hostel.

The hostel; 1318/19. Located at the entrance to the monastery in Piazza S. Maria Novella.

Chiostro Verde.
Until the construction of the cloister (around 1350), there was a garden here that belonged to the
monastery, but apparently not to the cloister - above the Gothic loggia of the cloister there was
later an upper, Baroque loggia with pillars and basket arches, which probably dates from the 17th
century (see note 84).

Chiostro de'Morti
Originally there was probably a Romanesque cloister, and from the mid-13th century to the mid-
14th century perhaps a Gothic cloister loggia running around all four sides (cf. note 66) - For the
reconstruction of the demolished buildings to the north of the Chiostro de'Morti, which are
described below, see the plan on p. 693.


Chapel of St. Benedict of the Tornaquinci (plan no. 18); probably built in the late 13th century -
see Wood-Brown, 1902, 99.

St. Paul's Chapel of the Alberti (plan no. 10). Built in the late 13th century, rebuilt in 1565, see
Wood-Brown, 1902, 100, 105, 108.

Brunelleschi Chapel of St. Lawrence (plan no. 11). Built soon after 1333 as the Simon Thaddeus
Chapel of the Brotherhood of S. Gesù Pellegrino. Rebuilt in 1565, see Wood-Brown,
1902,106,108.

St. Martin's Chapel of the Nelli (plan no. 12). Built before 1347, rebuilt in 1565, see Wood-
Brown, 1902, 106/07, 108.

Building of the Confraternity of S. Gesù Pellegrino (plan no. 14). Built around 1347, located to
the north opposite the last three chapels mentioned. The entrance was exactly opposite the Lrenz
chapel. Behind it was a small cloister. From its north-west corner you entered a Anteroom.
Behind this was the oratory (plan no. 15). Cf. Wood-Brown,1902, 107/08; the whole is depicted
on the city view by Stefano Bonsignori (1584) (reproduction in Mori-Boffito,Piante e vedute di
Firenze).

Chapel of the Stigmata of St. Francis (patrons: Alfieri-Strinati). Built in 1363, it is located
approximately at the place numbered 13 on the plan. Vgl.Wood-Brown,1902,108.
Garden wing of the dormitory (?) Such a building is shown on the plan from the Baroque period
(no. 21).

Monastero del Capitolo". The oldest chapter house, built in 1244, was located on Via Valfonda -
probably in the extreme north-east of the monastery district - where the Tertiaries of the
Dominican Order - "Pinzocchere di Penitenza" - had built a small convent in 1308. Cf. Wood-
Brown,1902,77.

The dormitories at the "Chiostro Grande" (plan no. 29 and 30). They were originally three-aisled
pillared halls, without the cell walls already shown on the plan, which were probably added in
the 16th or 17th century - For the staircase (no. 28), see note 65 - On the upper floor above the
west end of dormitory no. 30 is the "Cappela del Papa", built in 1418-20.

The "Pope's hostel" (plan no. 31). A series of rooms that the city government had built as a hostel
for distinguished guests in 1418-20, located on the upper floor of the west wing of the "Chiostro
Grande"; accessible through the associated chapel (cf. (see previous section), also by a staircase
at the south end (from the Via della Scala), allegedly also by a flight of steps built according to a
design by Lorenzo Ghiberti or Giuliano Pesello in 1418-20, on the lowest post of which the city's
heraldic lion, Donatello's "Marzocco", sat (this flight of steps is said to have been located in the
west wing of the cloister of the "Chiostro Grande" [?])(99). In 1434 the halls were rebuilt and
columns were erected above the entrance on the Via della Scala to support a protective roof.
Cf.Wood-Brown,1902, 90ff.-The flight of steps has been demolished, the inn completely
disfigured by later alterations


## BUILDING DESCRIPTION

## CHURCH

Photographs of the building: Older drawings in the Uffizi (nos.
4639,4650,4657,4682,4772);cf.Ferri,Indice,1885,52.-The most accurate ground-riB: by
Ferdinando Ruggieri, engraving in,,Esequie di Luigi I. cattolico Re della Spagna" etc., by
Niccolò Marcelli Venuti, Firenze 1724.-Summary building records in Dehio-von Bezold, Kirch-
liche Baukunst des Abendlandes, VIII,1901,534,539;Wood-Brown,1902; Supino, Gli albori,
1906; Paatz, Werden und Wesen der Tre-centoarchitektur in Toskana, 1937, fig.1ff. (the ground
plan fig. 27 is based on Ruggieri's ground plan).-fig. p.682.

Type. Three-aisled Gothic pillar basilica with transept and five adjoining square choir chapels, of
which the central one is twice as large as the others.- Since the terrain under the church slopes
slightly from east to west, and since the older cemetery was to be preserved under the church, an
artificial base had to be built under the western half of the church to compensate for this; it partly
contains burial vaults (cf. Wood-Brown, 1902, 96).
Outside.
South-north-facing Gothic quarry stone building; most of the structure is made of house stone
(Macigno), a smaller part of brick. Marble incrustation on the façade.

Facade.
Its structure corresponds to the basilica cross-section of the nave behind it: a lower, wider part
rises up to the height of the side aisles; above its center rises the front wall of the upper aisle
(with a pediment), flanked by two volutes. The lower part has two storeys, a high ground floor
and an attic. All parts are richly clad in white, red and green marble. - Components from two
different construction periods and styles overlap and intermingle: Gothic parts, which were
created around 1350 (probably by Fra Jacopo Talenti), and Renaissance parts, which were
created in 1456-70 according to a design by Leone Battista Alberti. The older parts dominate the
lowest storey of the façade up to the base of the attic. The younger parts intertwine with the older
ones on the ground floor; on the upper floors, only they are present.

The Gothic sections have an ancient appearance, almost in the spirit of the great architects of the
late Dugento and early Trecento (100). Its model could have been the façade of S. Paolo in
Pistoia, a creation of Giovanni Pisano's building school from 1313; in addition, the Florentine
cathedral façade by Arnolfo di Cambio probably also had an inspiring effect - the central section
has been replaced by Alberti's main portal. On either side of it, four narrow, high wall bays are
divided by slender pilaster-like pilasters supporting four semi-circular blind arches. At the
bottom of each wall bay is a pointed-arched burial niche ("avello") (100a); in the two bays that
lie beneath the flanking walls of the upper aisle, two slender pointed-arched portals, each with a
low wimperg, open in its place. The vertical structure is intersected by a horizontal one: at the
bottom, a fairly high, richly and finely profiled base; above this, the band of ornamented
sarcophagus fronts of the tomb niches, interrupted by the portals; at the height of the transom
points of the niche arches, profiles that cross the pilasters; above the pointed arches, a cornice
that cranks over the pilasters; below the crowning blind arches, a row of capitals. On the pointed
arches of the tomb niches, the wedge stones are alternately green and white; the white wall
panels above the niches are patterned with green rectangles (101); two rows of these rectangles
follow one another; the rectangles of the upper row end in semicircular arches at the top.

The Renaissance parts: most important building photos: Laspeyres, Die Kirchen der Renaissance
in Mittelitalien, 1882, XI;Stegmann-Gey-müller, Architektur der Renaissance in Toscana, IIIa,
11, 12 (102).Leone Battista Alberti attempted to extract an antique composition from the existing


state of the building: he gave the already incrusted ground floor a new rhythm by installing a
monumental "order" of three-quarter columns; he designed the remaining area above as an attic;
while he thus echoed the antique triumphal arch scheme on the lower, broader part of the façade,
he gave the lower part of the façade an antique triumphal arch scheme.

He gave the still undecorated front of the upper arcade the shape of a temple front. However, he
was unable to fulfill the Renaissance demand for axial justice, as he adopted the Gothic system
in which the flanks of the upper arcade have the portal openings below them. In place of the
(three?) Gothic central bays, a mighty niche-like portal opens with a pilaster-studded jamb and a
round arch designed as a coffered barrel vault. Flanking it are two colossal columns set into the
wall and two corresponding columns further to the left and right, directly next to the green and
white (horizontally) striped corners (widened to form strong pillars). An antique entablature rests
on the capitals of the columns and corner pillars and at the same time on the intervening apexes
of the Gothic blind arches as the conclusion of the lowest story of the façade; above this follows
the attic, a white zone with juxtaposed green striped squares, each of which has a rosette etc. in
the center - similar to the decorative squares above the gallery of the baptistery; the striped
corner pillars of the first floor continue at the corners. On the front wall of the upper aisle, the
marble cladding forms a composition in the style of an ancient temple façade, which is depicted
using the Florentine incrustation style: four pilasters (horizontally striped in green and white)
divide three wall bays and support an entablature above which a pediment rises. In the middle,
wider wall panel, the older, Gothic rose window (too low-set); in the gable, the sun-like Jesus
emblem; on the frieze of the entablature, the name of the founder and the completion date 1470
in large Antiqua letters; the white wall panels are divided by green rectangular strips, each of
which contains a green star pattern in the middle. Two volutes serve as spandrels between the
front of the clerestory and the wider lower part of the façade - for the first time in the history of
architecture, a motif that was to conquer the architecture of Europe from here. The shape of the
volutes is inspired by the buttress volutes on Brunelleschi's cathedral dome lantern; rich
incrustation ornamentation on each volute, each dominated by a Gothic rose.

The main portal was executed by the sculptor Gio-vanni di Bertino and his workshop; the
"imprese" of the Rucellai family (sails) and the Medici family (ring with feather), who were
closely associated with them, are attached there and to the relief and encrusted frieze under the
attic as leitmotifs (103).

Nave; around 1279-1310.

Three-aisled basilica. Very simple structure, in striking contrast to French Gothic and in close
connection with Italian-Romanesque building habits. The side aisles and the clerestory are
divided into wall bays by pilaster-like buttresses, each containing a window (ogival windows in
the side aisles, lancet windows in the clerestory). At the top of each nave a round-arched frieze,
which is cranked over the buttresses on the side aisles (not on the central nave); lion heads as
gargoyles on the crankings.The front, somewhat younger bays (after 1300) have slightly different
window and frieze profiles than the last two bays in front of the transept, which are somewhat


older (around 1278-1300).- On the east side in the third bay, a later (around 1300), now walled-
up, magnificent side portal (103a) in the type of a richly varied round-arched pillar-pillar portal.

Transept and choir chapels; around 1246-79.
Basic features. The two transepts, the crossing between them and the adjoining main choir chapel
are somewhat lower than the central nave of the nave; chapels of much lower height are placed
in front of the transepts all around, with a strong corner pillar of rectangular base at each corner
of the end walls of the transepts and the main choir chapel (104). A frieze of pointed arches on
consoles runs around the transverse arms and the main choir chapel (including corner pillars) at
the height of the upper wall end, above which rise the three low gables of the end walls and on
the corner pillars cube-like tops with small, baroque pyramid helmets (the latter are missing on
the eastern transverse arm, however w(here blind arches are attached to the cube tops instead).

The three end walls of the transverse arms and the main choir chapel are the most richly
structured. On all the gable slopes there are Cistercian-style brick console cornices - on the main
choir chapel there are three lancet windows joined together in a group (the central one higher)
with a small rose window above each lancet - also a Cistercian motif (105). The fact that all
these windows are held together by a huge, pointed blind arch and connected to the corner pillars
is idiosyncratic and grand (106). There is a recessed cross in the gable and a single pointed
arched window (now walled up) in the east transept, with a rose window above it (107); above
this is a pointed arched blind window (framed by columns) which pierces the cornice at the base
of the gable (108).

The choir chapels: the main choir chapel has already been described; in the rear part of each of
its side walls is a lancet window, which was already walled up during construction due to a
change of plan (109); to the left and right of the main choir chapel are two side choirs half the
size. On their rear wall, buttresses, one between each and a slightly larger one on the exposed
corner of each of the two outer side choirs; they are structured to match the corner pillars of the
main choir chapel (110). A frieze crowns them, forming the upper end of the side choirs. In
contrast to the corresponding but somewhat younger frieze on the main choir chapel and on the
transverse arms, it is made of brick and is quite richly structured: at the bottom a "German band",
above it an arched frieze of columns and pointed trefoils, at the top a cornice (111). - Each side
choir originally had a pointed arch window at the back; only the one immediately to the left of
the main choir chapel has survived. Of the others, the walled outlines are still partially
recognizable, above which a transverse rectangular lancet window now opens in each of the
three chapels - ingredients of the late Renaissance and Baroque periods.

In front of the two western side choirs is the low wall of a corridor that has been laid out in front.
The chapel extensions. The unadorned "Cappella della Pura" (late 15th century) in the angle
between the nave and the eastern transept; the Rucellai Chapel (around 1303/25) with three
masonry lancet windows in front of the end wall of this transept. - The sacristy by Fra Jacopo
Talenti (c. 1350/60) is located at a corresponding angle on the western transverse arm,
surrounded by the monastery buildings; the three pointed arches of the large window in its rear


wall (see p. 691 below) are framed by a semi-circular blind arch. In front of the end wall is the
high Strozzi Chapel (c. 1279), in which a lancet window opens.

The bell tower; 1330.
It leans against the southwest corner of the western transverse arm - probably the work of Fra
Jacopo Talenti. Like the other work of the master, the façade, it appears very ancient, almost
Romanesque, and was probably modeled on a building from the late 13th century, the bell tower
of Ognissanti. - It rises above a square base. Its corners are each reinforced with a flat template
and round arch friezes grow out of these corner templates, dividing the four storeys. These
storeys increase in height and openness towards the top. In the lowest, a narrow pointed arch on
each side, in the second a two-part pointed arch, in the third three round arches supported by
columns, in the fourth a corresponding but higher and more open group of sound openings,
above which a slightly projecting round arch frieze forms a cornice. Above each side of the
tower an eyelash gable, between which rises the four-sided helmet; it was renewed in 1778
(112), generally probably fairly faithful.

Interior.
Monumental Gothic spatial creation, the oldest in Florence, groundbreaking for the beginnings of
Florentine Gothic and always inspiring for its further development, highly significant and fruitful
due to its bold security.

The bold certainty with which a Gothic spatial and structural system with a Tuscan character was
developed from the scheme of the Burgundian Cistercian basilica is highly significant and
fruitful.-Paatz, Werden und Wesen der Trecentoarchitektur in Toskana, 1937,7ff. (113), gives a
detailed account of the historical significance of this development.-The individual parts of the
church are discussed from the choir to the façade, in the order in which they were built. -
Fixtures and additions from later periods follow at the end.

Structural system.
Articulated pillars (and corresponding wall pillars), pointed arches and ribbed vaults everywhere.
All walls and vaults are made of lightly plastered quarry stone, all structures of gray-brown,
finely worked sandstone (pietra serena).

Choir chapels and transept; around 1246-79.
The transept is formed by three square bays of equal size: the crossing and the two transverse
arms; at the back of the crossing is the main choir chapel of equal size and design, on either side
of it, half the size, with two square side choirs on each transverse arm; this scheme is taken from
the Cistercian basilicas (114). In front of the side choirs there is a platform of two steps; in front
of the main choir chapel, which is higher again, there is a staircase platform of five steps
projecting into the crossing (115).


The ground floor (c. 1246-65): the side choirs and the equally high lower parts of the main choir
chapel and the transverse arms. The impression is determined by the pointed arched openings of
the side choirs and the square pillars between them on the side choir end walls. At the front of
each pillar is a pilaster, the capital of which is continued on the other parts of the pillar. The
antique-style pilaster motif appears to have been taken from the Romanesque traditions of the
older medieval Italian mendicant orders (116); however, these pilasters were perhaps intended as
a support for (Cistercian-Gothic) models, which were intended to ascend to the transept vaults
(perhaps planned in six parts at the time), but which were not executed in the second
construction phase (117). The ribbon-like, sharply cut acan.thus capitals have a Pisan-
Romanesque character (118). Corner services rise in the transept corners and at the corners of the
opening of the main choir chapel articulated pillars rise up to the vault; the scheme of the latter -
cruciform with corner services and half-columns on the transepts and pilaster-like designs on the
triumphal arch side - is taken from Cistercian models, but developed more sturdily (119). - In
each choir chapel, corner services and a cross-ribbed vault of Cistercian profiling (120). Capitals
figured on the services - a Gothic motif that probably originates from the castles of Emperor
Frederick II (121). The little figures perched on the capitals or clutching them are, however,
entirely Italianate in style, partly in the sense of the Pisan-Romanesque school (in the side choirs
on the left transept), partly in the sense of Niccolò Pisano (in the side choirs on the right transept,
which were apparently completed somewhat later) (122).-The All Saints' Chapel of the Rucellai
in front of the southern part of the end wall of the left transept is clearly one of the oldest parts;
this rectangular room, which was later incorporated into the bell tower built above it, has a barrel
vault and an Italian-Romanesque portal (122a); a marble wall niche in the easternmost side choir;
it is divided by a small column with a jonised capital and bears two Gothic trefoil arches;
Between the arches and the crowning gable slopes is a finely sculpted tympanum with a tree in
relief in which birds are climbing around - a motif from the central French Gothic of Chartres
(123). The arcades connecting the transept with the nave were only built in the following
construction period (cf. below).

The upper parts (around 1270/79). Of the previously described prefabrications, only the services
in the transept corners continue upwards, but not the pilasters of the side choir entrances, the
latter perhaps as a result of a change of plan at that time, which replaced the six-part transept
entrances that were possibly originally planned.

In each transept and in the crossing there is a square cross-ribbed vault with a Cistercian ribbed
profile; in the end wall of the left transept a simple, still Romanesque-looking eye window; in the
end wall of the right transept a Gothic rose window (124); the work may therefore have been
promoted from left to right. On the capitals of the corner pillars at the front of the main choir
chapel, softly modeled acanthus foliage, richer profiles and half-figures in the style of the


Sienese pulpit by Niccolò Pisano-apparently more recent, refined creations by the decorators,
who also executed the vault consoles in the side choirs on the right transverse arm (125).

The mouth of the nave (around 1279).
In the south transept wall facing the nave, the central part, which contains the entrances to the
three naves, is slightly further south than the side parts, so that two wall steps run from bottom to
top immediately next to the side aisle entrances, even through the two lancet windows that open
above the side aisle entrances. This inconsistency reveals a new change of plan (the second):
when the construction of the nave began, the central part of the transept was apparently enlarged
slightly to the south and at the same time the nave was built higher than originally intended; the
capitals of the side aisles and the nave arcades are higher than the capitals of the side aisles, and
the clerestory of the nave rises slightly higher than the crossing (126).

The nave; 1279 to around 1310.
Three naves, each with six bays of different lengths. Between the naves, which are arranged in a
basilica-like arrangement, there are articulated pillars with pointed arch arcades, with
corresponding wall pillars on the side aisle walls and a ribbed vault in each bay of each nave. A
pointed arch window in each side aisle bay (shortened at the bottom in 1857).

In each central nave bay in the clerestory on both sides an eye window. True to Italian
Romanesque tradition, two parts are distinguished in the nave: 1. the lay church or "lower
church", which comprises the four front bays and was probably intended primarily for preaching
in this Dominican building; 2. the tramezzo4 , which is two steps higher and encompasses the
last two bays before the crossing; until 1565/72 it contained the monks' choir in the central nave
and, next to its façade, grilles that closed off the side aisles from the lay church (127).

The monk's choir zone ("Tramezzo"); around 1279-90. Executed following the upper parts of the
transept after a change of plan (see above), but by the same builders. As in the transept, the pillar
bases are ancient (Attic), the ribbed profiles are early Gothic. -Following on from Tuscan-
Romanesque buildings, a change in the shape of the pillars distinguishes this part of the nave
from the front part (128). The pair of crossing pillars corresponds to the Cistercian Early Gothic
corner pillars of the main choir chapel on the rear side of the crossing. The next pair of pillars, on
the other hand, is of Florentine-Romanesque design: four half-columns in front of a square core,
arranged in such a way that only narrow corner edges protrude from the core between the
templates, and that one template rises above the others up into the clerestory to the vault belt-this
is the pillar scheme of S. Miniato and very probably also of the older, Romanesque church of S.
Maria Novella, which was only demolished at the time. The next and last pair of pillars again
correspond to the crossing pillars - the pillar and wall pillar capitals and their finely and richly
profiled cover plates correspond stylistically to the forms in the upper part of the transept. A few


capitals at the transept entrances have simpler cover plates and ancient Romanesque-Pisan motifs
(dragons; medallions with half-figures); they were evidently made during the first construction
phase (1246 ff.), but were not moved until long after (1279) (129). - According to Pisan-
Romanesque custom, the arches of the tramezzo arcades are painted with a black and white
wedge stone pattern.

The central aisle bays here are transversely rectangular, the side aisle bays longitudinally
rectangular - similar to some Italian Cistercian churches (130).

The lay house (the "lower church"); c. 1290-1310. The structure here is generally the same, but
all the pillars are of the same type, the Tuscan-Romanesque of the central pair of pillars in the
"Tramezzo", albeit somewhat modified into the mathematically abstract in accordance with the
tendencies of the late 13th century. The edges between the half-columns are developed on three
sides by chamfering, and the corners of the lower plinth below the bases are chamfered by
downward-facing "tongues". The ribbed profile corresponds to the three-sided cross-section of
the pillar edges. The capitals have coarse, herbaceous acanthus foliage and unprofiled cover
plates. - The bays are longer, so that their ground plan approaches a square in the central nave
and an excessively elongated rectangle in the side aisles - but without regularity, so that the
individual bays are of quite different lengths (131).

Due to the height and width of its arcades and the slight elevation of its clerestory, the nave
space appears wide, open and hall-like, almost in the sense of late Nordic Gothic. This effect was
probably achieved by following the example of Tuscan-Romanesque, pseudo-basilical rooms
(132), and was striven for more and more decisively, especially in the youngest part, the "Laien-
haus": there the merging of the different parts of the room is further enhanced by chamfering the
edges of the pillars and the ribs. Again, in an almost late Gothic manner, the mighty room is
given solidity by the unity of simple, large wall surfaces, it is given life by the play of forces of
the calmly powerful, soaring forms of the pillars, arches and windows and by the picturesque
play of the shifting lights and shadows. Nevertheless, it ultimately appears different from the late
Gothic halls of Central Europe. The organic physicality of the column-like pillars is original.
Urflorentine and at the same time completely Dominican in its vivid unity, the plausible logic of
this strong, simple, sweeping, ascending system of members (133). The dynamics of this
Romanesque type of pillar, clamped together with Gothic pointed arches in the service of Gothic
vaults, are incomparable: the intimate connection with the Gothic construction gives it something
urgent that allows the force of the formal energies concentrated in it to be fully felt – it is no
wonder Michelangelo particularly loved and praised this church (134).

Additions and extensions.
They are described in the same order as the furnishings: side altars in the nave; a neo-Gothic
altar tabernacle in each aisle bay, 1857/61.


Chapel "della Pura"; around 1472ff.
Situated in the angle between the nave and the right transept. Rectangular room with two
spherical vaults. In the inner corner the altar of the image of grace, a marble tabernacle in the
style of the tabernacle of the image of grace in the SS. Annunziata: a column and two pilasters
support a vault and an ornamented ceiling; the whole is perhaps the work of Giovanni di Bertino
(135). Since 1841 it has formed the northernmost bay of a neoclassical portico by Baccani
running along the western wall of the chapel; on the opposite wall a corresponding portico, also
built in 1841.Rucellai Chapel; between 1303 and 1325. Located in front of the end wall of the
right transverse arm, above a vault; accessible via an open staircase. Irregular transverse
rectangular room with a ribbed vault (136).

Gondi Chapel (first side choir on the left transept); built by Giuliano da Sangallo around
1503/08 (137); the only surviving example in Florence of Giuliano's late Roman-Classical style,
which was so decisive for the development of the High Renaissance and Mannerism (138). Dry
execution. On the altar wall, triumphal arch-like marble cladding, a large round-arched niche
(138 a), flanked by two pilaster-framed narrow side bays, each containing a statue niche at the
bottom, with an entablature and a circular recess above; mensa with balusters. On each of the
side walls, a three-part bench on sarcophagi decorated with skulls with a three-part backrest,
which is divided by acanthus-decorated armrests and columns and decorative panels standing on
them (white marble frame, columns and sarcophagi in black marble, the fillings in red marble;
Tuscan capitals with rosettes and egg-and-dart). - Giuliano's architecture only covers the lower
half of the walls. The upper part of the altar wall was covered in Baroque style in 1602 by order
of Simone Gondi (139).

Gaddi Chapel (second side choir on the left transept); built by Giovan Antonio Dosio 1575- 78
(140).-Ground plan, elevation, details etc. in Stegmann-Geymüller, Architektur der Renaissance
in Toscana, IX a, 1896, Figs. 3 and 4, Plates 4 and 6.-Main work of the classicist direction in
Florentine late Mannerist architecture, unique due to the restrained richness of the decoration. In
each wall there are two recessed corner columns; between them a sarcophagus below (a mensa
on the altar wall) and an aedicula above. Dosio has understood how to lend a beautiful
tranquillity to these Michelangelesque, densely packed motifs through tactful treatment; he has
also been able to unfold the full splendour of colorful incrustation on the aedicules and the
magnificent floor without somehow appearing over-rich, just as he has wonderfully sensitively
harmonized the individual elements - architecture, sculpture and painting (141), space and body,
surface and color.Pietra dura work and ceiling stucco based on Roman models, one of the oldest
examples in Florence (142).Strozzi Chapel (at the front of the left, western transverse arm,
higher than the transverse arm: above the vaults of the cloister); around 1279; longitudinal
rectangular room with ribbed vaulting on corbels; a lancet window in the rear wall.

Rucellai Chapel of All Saints;
c. 1246 ff. - To the left of the Strozzi Chapel. VgL above p. 685.

Facade of the sacristy (south wall of the left transept) by Gherardo Silvani or Fabbrizio Boschi,
1616 (143). Late, particularly interesting example of Michelangelesque "architectural sculpture"


in the sense of Buontalenti.three-door system with bizarre individual forms. Next to the main
doorway are two pilasters with a bracket covering; above them are two gnarled, diverging
pediment fragments that develop out of an inverted shell; above them is a bracket-covered
lunette and a pediment as the upper end of the central section. Above the lower side doors, shell
volutes and box-like fields.

Sacristy (in the angle between the left transverse arm and the nave); by Fra Jacopo Talenti;
around 1350. Longitudinally rectangular room with pointed ribbed vault on (neo-Gothic?) corner
consoles (144); in the south wall a large, tripartite Gothic window of the type of the window in
the main choir chapel: the central pointed arch rises higher than the two lateral ones, above each
of which an eye is attached.

UPPER CEMETERY
This is the name given to the walled area between the nave, the right transverse arm, Piazza S.
Maria Novella and Via degli Avelli in memory of its medieval purpose; its south and east walls
facing the square and the street are clad in white and green marble. The series of burial niches
("avelli") that decorates the lowest part of the adjacent church façade continues here: at the
bottom a finely profiled plinth, above which the sarcophagi are placed side by side (ornamented
at the front), above each sarcophagus a niche consisting of two low pillars and a pointed arch
with white and green wedge stones, above which a low wall and a white and green horizontal
stripe.This avello system is also repeated on the inside of the enclosing wall and on the eastern
flank of the church longhouse around the cemetery. Next to the church façade and the "della
Pura" chapel there is a higher arch as a portal - the whole was almost completely renovated in
1847 and 1861 ff, but probably more or less faithful to the remains of the original state (145).

## CLOISTER

Photographs of the building. Older in a of the Uffizi drawing collection (146). Newer floor plans
in Wood-Brown, 1902.- Cf. also our illustration on p.693.

Preliminary remark. Due to their large number, the monastic buildings can only be described in
outline here, especially as many of them have been preserved in poor condition and are
inaccessible. The location of the parts described can be seen from the ground plan mentioned
above.

The entrance.
The monastery façade is located in Piazza S. Maria Novella and adjoins the church façade at a
right angle to the south. It consists of a wall designed to resemble the surrounding wall of the
"upper cemetery", which was probably almost completely renovated around 1847/61: burial
niches ("avelli") and green and white marble incrustation. Directly next to the church façade a
small portal, further south a larger one. - Behind the wall is an unadorned rectangular forecourt.
Behind the adjoining western wing of the

```
Chiostro della Porta.
```

Rectangular cloister, 5 x 5 round-arched Ionic column arcades in sober High Renaissance forms.
Due to its location, it can be tentatively identified with the "Chiostro della Porta", which is said
to have been built in 1505. - If you turn back to the forecourt from here, a passageway along the
western flank of the church leads first to the "Chiostro Verde" (see below) and from its northern
side to the "Chiostro Vecchio".

Chiostro Vecchio or Chiostro dei Morti.
Originally the monks' cemetery; the oldest part of the monastery, built on the site of Romanesque
buildings in the later 13th and 14th centuries. The layout is due to the Romanesque buildings that
have disappeared.

The entrance from the Chiostro Verde is a vaulted corridor between the church sacristy, where
the Romanesque church once ended, and the "Spanish Chapel", where the pre-Romanesque
chapel once stood. Wide, flat, arched ribbed vaults on wall consoles decorated with foliage;
around 1279 (147). - In the right (eastern) wall remains of older buildings: at the entrance
masonry from the Romanesque church (148); at the far (northern) end under the All Saints'
Chapel attached to the church a walled pointed arch from a formerly open pillar arbor (the
substructure of the chapel; soon after 1246); an associated second arch is in the chapel wall to the
right of the aisle at an angle to the right (149). - The Strozzi-Trinciavelli Chapel (c. 1330) at the
left end of the aisle; it lies at an angle between the main room and the choir of the Spanish
Chapel and opens with a pointed arch to the aisle and another pointed arch to the Chiostro dei
Morti; the arches rest on a free-standing corner pillar; according to tradition, this chapel was
already present before the Spanish Chapel was built, and its ancient profiles also speak for this.
The cemetery; around 1280/90. Behind the Strozzi-Trinciavelli chapel, the passage continues
under the other Strozzi chapel in front of the transept (150). To the left, it opens like a cloister
towards the cemetery with segmental arches on sturdy octagonal pillars standing on a low wall
(151); to the right, it is accompanied by a row of chapels, most of which are also located under
the last-mentioned Strozzi chapel and lean against the front wall of the transept with their rear
sides. They contain ribbed vaults (partly round-arched, partly ogee-arched) and now only open
towards the cloister (with one arch each), but originally also opened to the side (also with
arches), so that the row of chapels must have acted like a second nave of the cloister. At the end
of each partition wall between two chapels there is a slender octagonal pillar as a remnant of this
system. The corridor with the row of chapels now runs into a wall in the north

The aisle with the row of chapels now ends at a wall in the north, but continued there in the past
(152), with a Renaissance loggia with Tuscan columns above its Gothic ground floor. - On the
north side of the cemetery there is a building that shows hardly any traces of its original state; in
its south-east corner there is a capital of the type of the entrance con-soles, further west a
corresponding capital, and above both (connecting them) a walled arch: here a Gothic chapel
apparently originally opened; perhaps there were once other chapels adjoining it - on the west
side of the cemetery a modernized building. - On the south side is the wall of the Spanish
Chapel. Between it and the west wing is an intermediate building with an ancient cornice -


perhaps the remains of a monastery built here before the Spanish Chapel. To the east, next to the
choir of the Spanish Chapel, is the Strozzi-Trinciavelli Chapel already described; above it are the
western parts of the "Stanza dei Beati", a room accessible from the transept of the church. To the
south of the entrance to the "Chiostro Vecchio" is the "Chiostro Verde".

Chiostro Verde
So called because of its gray-green in gray-green frescoes, built around 1350-60, probably by Fra
Jacopo Talenti. The most beautiful Gothic cloister in the whole of Florence - one of the most
perfect embodiments of the Italian Trecento architectural ideal thanks to the harmony of its space
and forms. - Square in plan. On each side, five round arches open on eight-second pillars resting
on a small wall (153); the central arch on each side is a segmental arch, i.e. wider, and the small
wall is interrupted underneath it; in this way, four central openings are created, emphasized
architecturally, which allow passage from the loggia to the garden in the middle; in the loggia,
the bays are square, the ribbed vaults are round and octagonal; the spatial proportions are
unusually balanced. The single-piece forms are also structured with exquisite sensitivity: on the
pillars, delicately profiled plinths and strong leaf capitals (154), on the bows, a painted black and
white wedge stone pattern (renewed in the 19th century) and painted zigzag bands on the ribs of
the vault. The following buildings frame the cloister:

The Spanish Chapel (on the north side).
So called since about 1540, when Duchess Eleonora of Toledo assigned it to the Spaniards in
Florence as a national chapel (155); originally the main room served as a chapter house, the choir
chapel as the family and burial chapel of Buonamico di Lapo Guidalotti (156). The whole is
probably the work of Fra Jacopo Talenti (157). In the façade, a portal opens (as is usually the
case with Gothic chapter houses) between two two-part cloverleaf arched windows with seven-
pane tracery; the portal and windows are unusually richly and delicately ornamented (158).
Behind it is the transverse rectangular main room, covered by a huge round-arched ribbed vault
rising from four low five-sided corner pillars.All the parts of the room, the walls and the system
of members seem to merge imperceptibly into one another to form a softly modeled whole; this
is the most perfect fulfillment of the architectural ideal that the Dominican builders of S. Maria
Novella had first striven for in the nave of the church, and a top achievement in the interior
design of the entire Italian Trecento (159). The chancel chapel was structured in line with the
main room, but was altered somewhat in the late 16th century, when the entrance arch in
particular was removed.

The south wing.
It now contains the monks' apartment and is inaccessible (160).

The Capitolo del Nocentino and the refectory.
Together they form the west wing of the cloister. The "Capitolo" is located in the northern end of
this wing; it was built in 1303-08 and is a rectangular, almost square room with a round-arched
ribbed vault on four five-sided corner pillars (161).


The large rectangular hall with round-arched ribbed vaults on the corner and wall pillars; it was
built in 1350-60, probably by Fra Jacopo Talenti. Its structure is based on that of the neighboring
"Capitolo del Nocentino" and differs from it only in the richer profiling of the capitals. The tree
effect is simple and powerful (162).

Chiostro Dati
So named after the famous Dominican order general and prior of S. María Novella Lionardo
Dati, who inscribed himself next to the scroll consoles as the founder ("Leonardus generalis").
Situated to the south in front of the southern end wall of the refectory just described, built around

1424. One of the earliest and most ornamental architectural monuments of the nascent early
Renaissance: cloister with all-round slender round-arched columned arcades, ribless cross vaults
and still somewhat Gothically stylized, loosely composed acanthus capitals (column bases and
portals largely renewed). In the south wing, a broad, finely sculptured Gothic wall fountain
façade.

Chiostro Grande
Huge cloister, the largest in medieval Florence; located to the west of the Chiostro Verde,
accessible through a passage from its northwest corner. Built around 1303/40, it now belongs to
the Scuola sott’ufficiale Carabinieri.

The loggia is modeled on the (older) "Chiostro Vecchio": octagonal arcades with octagonal
pillars on pedestals, octagonal ribbed vaults. However, the pillars are slender like columns,
making the cloister appear more delicate and transparent (163). Above the north wing and the
adjoining north half of the east wing of the gothic loggia rises a disproportionately high upper
loggia with Tuscan columns and round arches - an addition from the second half of the 15th
century.

The framing arcade, which encloses the cloister on all four sides, is largely inaccessible. In the
southern half of the east wing there are two rooms already described, the refectory and the
"Capitolo del Nocentino". Separated from them by the passage leading from the "Chíostro
Verde", in the northern half of the east wing on the ground floor is a large Gothic hall (c. 1333 f.)
with three naves, two rows of columns and ribbed vaults. On the upper floor of the east wing
there used to be a large dormitory, which has now been largely consumed by more recent
additions; on the ground floor of the north wing there is a second dormitory (164), a large Gothic
hall of the same type as the hall in the northern half of the east wing; it is now disfigured by
more recent additions. Before the profanation, the following rooms were located above it
(following one another from east to west): the large library hall, extended in 1629 by Matteo
Nigetti and provided with a rich portal; two reading rooms; a dormitory; the "Cappella del Papa",
which belonged to the adjoining papal apartment (165); the chapel is still preserved, the other
rooms have probably been disfigured by alterations. The entire west wing was occupied from
1419 by the guest house, which was used for popes, princes and other distinguished guests of the


monastery and the Florentine government and was incorporated into the SS Concezione nunnery
in 1563/92 and rebuilt for this purpose (166); only a few pointed arch windows in the east wall
have been preserved from the old forms; the interior is inaccessible. The south wing now
contains the "Museo del Risorgimento"; on its ground floor are the simple, somewhat restored
rooms of the former "Infermeria", the infirmary (extended in 1428?), and a rich portal by Matteo
Nigetti, 1612, which once belonged to the monastery pharmacy (167). A beautiful staircase leads
to the upper floor, allegedly by Giorgio Vasari, around 1560 (168). The upper floor originally
housed the novices' dormitory; it was later divided into smaller rooms. One of them, facing only
the cloister, has been decorated with stucco since the 18th century. Stairs and stucco decorations.
To the west of the last room is the former St. Nicholas Chapel of the Acciaiuoli from which the
outside of the wall in this room is decorated with an arched frieze and a rich Gothic two-part
window.

The chapel was built in 1332 and is inaccessible today; it probably has the shape of a rectangular
hall. It has a sacristy, which can be reached from the Museo del Risorgimento through a
courtyard ("Chiostro dell'Infermeria"). The chapel originally served as an oratory for the
infirmary and was later incorporated into the buildings of the monastery pharmacy.

## FACILITIES

The church and monastery of S. Maria Novella, with their richly decorated interior, are among
the most important artistic monuments in Florence. The monastery, with its picturesque sequence
of richly decorated larger and smaller courtyards, chapels and other buildings, gives an
impressive impression of the intellectual and artistic intensity of the Florentine Trecento and
early Renaissance in general, and of Dominicanism in particular, in its seclusion and tranquility.
A historical overview of the decoration of the church and monastery during the 15th and early
16th centuries can be found in Wackernagel, Lebensraum, 1938, 43 ff.

CHURCH
Exteriors.
Facade.
Frescoes in the arched panels of the three portals; in the middle St. Thomas Aquinas kneeling
before the crucifix, in the background the Corpus Christi procession arriving in front of S. Maria
Novella, the center of the celebrations; inscribed by Ulisse Ciocchi, dated 1616; on the left
Aaron with manna; on the right Melchizedek with loaves (Old Testament parallels to the
Sacrifice of the Mass), by the same painter, completed in 1618 (169).
On the left (next to the frame pilasters) astronomical instruments.1572/74, on the right sundial
(horologium), inscription dated 1572 (170).

Interior
The best of the church's original furnishings have been preserved, in particular frescoes and
tombstones from the 13th century. A series of altarpieces of the Mannerist school in the side
aisles owe their creation to the Wasari Reform of 1565/72, which was commissioned by Grand


Duke Cosimo I to remove the monks' choir and systematize the formerly forced arrangement of
the side aisle furnishings, and the associated stone tabernacles were replaced by neo-Gothic ones
in 1861. At the same time, for the sake of greater "uniformity", the tombstones in the floor were
arranged in two rows, the windows were decorated with stained glass by the leading architect
Enrico Romoli and the painter Giuseppe Fattori and neo-Gothic blind doors were set into the side
aisle walls as frames for confessionals (171).

Facade wall.
At the top center rose window with stained glass, Coronation of Mary, framed by praising
angels; perhaps executed by monks from Ognissanti according to designs by Andrea Bonaiuti da
Firenze, mm 1365 (172).

To the west, next to the main portal, fresco, Annunciation; below, in a predella-like stripe,
Baptism of Christ, Adoration of the Magi and Nativity (with St. Bridget of Sweden); school of
Agnolo Gaddi, around 1400 (173); very overpainted.

Main portal after a drawing by Gaetano Baccani, 1857ff (174); fresco in its arched field, Nativity,
by Sandro Botticelli, around 1470 (175).

To the east of the main portal, fresco, Holy Trinity, by Masaccio, late major work by the artist, c.
1427/28; the Crucified, held by God the Father, next to Mary and John; these figures stand under
a barrel vault supported by two pillars; the founder and his wife kneel to the left and right in
front of the pillars. In its present location since 1861 (176).

In the right aisle, memorial plaque for Bernardo de' Veechietti, 1654 (176 a).

Center nave.
Upper nave window, bull's-eye panes with various colorful coats of arms, probably 14th century
(?).
On the first pillar on the right and left are holy water stoups; the right one is made of white
marble with a red marble support, donated by Mongolieri Bellozzo and Bartolo, 1412
(inscription); the left one is made of marble, 16th century.
On the third pillar on the left, pulpit made of white, partially gilded marble, 1443-48; after a
model by Brunelleschi; figurative reliefs: Annunciation, Nativity, Presentation in the Temple,
Giving of the Belt to Thomas, by Andrea di Lazzaro Cavalcanti, called Buggiano; ornaments
perhaps from the workshop of Giovanni di Piero del Ticcia; donated by the Rucellai (177).

In front of the high altar, bronze tomb slab of the prior and Dominican general Lionardo Statii de
Datis (+ 1423 or 1424), life-size reclining figure in bas-relief by Lorenzo Ghiberti; completed
before 1427 (178).

Right (eastern) aisle.


First bay (1399-1565 the altar was dedicated to the Madonna and St. Lawrence; patrons:
Giuocchi; after 1556 belonging to the Brotherhood of St. Lawrence, in the 19th century to the
Venturi family) (179) Wall tomb of Ippolito Venturi (+ 1817), inscribed by Stefano Ricci,
around 1817 (180). - Altarpiece, Martyrdom of St. Lawrence, by Girolamo Macchietti, inscribed
and dated 1573 (181) - Altar tabernacle and stained glass from 1861 (cf. p. 701). Wall tomb of
Anna Testard (+ 1809), wife of Ippolito Venturi; by Stefano Ricci (180).

Second bay (the altar was formerly dedicated to St. Maurice; patron Mazzinghi [da Campi]; after
1565 dedicated to St. Michael and St. James; patron: in the 19th century Zondari ne' Riccardi-
Strozzi) (182). Wall tomb of Beata Villana (+ 1360), a pious citizen from the
Maria Novella; by Bernardo Rossellino and his workshop, 1451/52; made of white marble on a
red base. The most important parts have been preserved: the dead woman on an implied
sarcophagus, above a canopy with two angels pulling back the curtain (183). Altarpiece,
Adoration of the Shepherds, above God the Father and Glory of the Angels, by Giovanni Battista
Naldini, inscribed and illegibly dated, unveiled in 1573 (184). Wall tomb of Blessed John of
Salerno (+ 1242), founder of the Dominican foundation of S. Maria Novella; imitation of the
tomb of Beata Villana, workshop of Vincenzo Danti, 1571 (185); with modern additions.

Third bay (patrons of the altar since around 1570: the Sommaia family). Altarpiece, Presentation
in the Temple, by Giovanni Battista Naldini, inscribed and dated 1577 (186). Neo-Gothic doors
to the left and right of the altar (cf. p. 701).

Fourth bay (the altar is dedicated to St. Thomas Aquinas); wall tomb of Ruggiero Minerbetti (+
1280), by Silvio Cosini, dated 1530 (187); marble sarcophagus and trophies, framed by pilasters,
covered by an architrave. Altarpiece, Deposition from the Cross, by Giovanni Battista Naldini,
inscribed and dated 1572 (188); tomb of Tommaso Minerbetti (f 1499); wall tomb, around
1550/65 (?), using an older wall tomb (around 1400), of which the right pillar and the base still
survive; all other parts added afterwards, archaizing architrave (189). Holy water basin in the
shape of a ship made of white marble, donated by Bartolomeo Cederni (inscription); 2nd half of
the 15th century.

Fifth bay (former patrons of the altar: the Brotherhood of Gesù Pellegrino e del Tempio; since
1861: Ricasoli) (190). Marble bust of Giuseppe Zanobi del Rosso (t 1831) Altarpiece, Sermon of
St. Vincent Ferrer, on the side.St. Vincent Ferrer, saints and benefactors to the sides, Christ in
Glory surrounded by angels above; inscribed by Jacopo Coppi, called del Meglio; date covered
by the frame, 2nd century.
t6. Century (191). Marble bust by Cosimo Rossi Melocchio (f1820)

Next to it two neo-Gothic tower frames (cf. p. 701).

Sixth bay. Entrance to the Cappella della Pura.


Patrons: Ricasoli (192). Built between 1472 and 1497 (cf. p. 689); in the north-west corner,
marble tabernacle with high baluster balustrade in the style of Giovanni di Bettino, around 1475,
containing the miraculous image of the Madonna della Pura, fresco depiction of the Madonna,
venerated by St. Agnes and a young man from the Lorini family; 14th century, very overpainted
(193). On the west wall epitaph of M.E.Ramirez de Montalvo (+ 1728) in colored marble. On the
east wall, wooden crucifix, early 14th century; Byzantinizing painting on the arms of the cross
(Cimabue style ?); the scenes at the feet of Christ by Raffaello Ximenes, 17th century (194).
Next to the crucifix, small painted silhouette figures on sawn-out wood, 17th century. Also a
half-figure, Christ as the Man of Sorrows, terracotta or cartapesta, 2nd half of the 15th century,
heavily overpainted.

On the staircase leading to the subterranean room under the Rucellai Chapel (see note 136), a
half-life-size crucifix by Baccio da Montelupo, 1501 (195). In the room below the Rucellai
Chapel, altarpiece, the Madonna blessing the bread of St. Anthony, venerated by angels and
saints; excellent work from the end of the 17th century (Pier Dandini ?).

Sixth bay, continuation: this part was built by Fra Domenico Pantaleoni, who died in 1376, as a
burial place for the Dominicans without their own family chapel (196); at that time it was
dedicated to the Madonna and St. Lawrence; later the altar came under the patronage of the
Ricasoli, who dedicated it to St. Raimund (197). Altarpiece, Resurrection of a Dead Child by St.
Raimund (in the background on a painted altarpiece Conversion of St. Paul), by Jacopo Ligozzi,
end of the 16th century (198); wall tomb of Giovanni di Battista Ricasoli, Bishop of Pistoia,
called dell' Ampollina († 1572); Niche with sarcophagus, above profile medallion and
ornamentation; white and green marble; by Romolo Fvarnens (7), 2nd half of the 16th century
(199). - Above bust of Cardinal Agostino Bausa († 1899), set in 1904.

Eastern transverse arm.
South rim. Terracotta bust of St. Dominican Archbishop Antoninus 1460 (?), in late Renaissance
tabernacle (202). Early Renaissance door, around 1474 (entrance to the Cappella della Pura). On
the right above the door, marble tomb of Tedice Aliotti, Bishop of Fiesole (f 1336); Florentine c.
1336; sarcophagus with the reclining figure of the deceased and angels on richly ornamented
consoles, surmounted by an arcade (201). - To the left of the door tomb of Patriarch Joseph of
Constantinople (on the Florentine consilium 1439); high pedestal in relief with two putti holding
an inscription; above it a round arch supported by two pairs of slender columns; in the pediment
above it a Salvator Mundi and leaf ornament; in the arcade the fresco of the standing patriarch,
completely renewed; the marble arcade is an interesting example of the transitional style, around
1439 (202). Above the tomb, wall tomb of Aldobrandino Cavalcanti, the founding prior of S.
Maria Novella and Bishop of Orvieto (f 1279); c. 1279; strikingly conservative, still very
Romanesque in appearance; the deceased still at the front of his sarcophagus, with two standing
Dominicans behind him; Romanesque Hanken friezes on the sarcophagus; on the narrow sides
St. John the Baptist and another St. John the Baptist and another St.,: above the sarcophagus a
pointed-arch arcade on unadorned pillars (203). In the arcade, on the sarcophagus, Marble


Madonna by Nino Pisano; inscribed, around 1360 (?); originally painted: perhaps a donation by
Lorenzo Ridolfi (204).

The Rucellai Chapel
(in front of the east wall of the eastern transept).
Dedicated to St. Catherine of Alexandria. Built between 1303 and 1325: attested in 1335 and
1356 in the possession of the Rucellai; after disputes it was once again firmly in their possession
in 1464. Raising of the footing floor to match the height of the Strozzi Chapel in 1464 (205).
Marble sarcophagus on the staircase landing, antique work of the 13th century with Romanesque
tendril border, on 16th century consoles; placed here by Bernardo Rucellai in 1510 (inscription)
(206).

Faint remains preserved; on the east wall next to the two biforia two Dominican saints; on the
south wall to the left of the window the beheading of St. Catherine, on the right a miracle scene
(?); immediately to the right of the person entering a horseman (St. George?); from the
succession of the Cecilian Master? Probably created soon after the chapel was built; uncovered
in 1912 (207).

Large panel painting on the back wall, the so-called Rucellai Madonna; enthroned Madonna with
child, adored by kneeling angels; on the frame medallions with bust portraits of apostles and
saints; main monument of Dugento painting, early work by Duccio di Buoninsegna, 1285 (?);
previously often attributed to Cimabue (208). On the north wall, panel painting, Martyrdom of St.
Catherine of Alexandria, by Giuliano Bugiardini, around 1530; commissioned from Bugiardini
by Palla Rucellai for the altar of the chapel and allegedly executed by him with the help of
Michelangelo (preliminary drawing of the figures in the foreground) and Tribolo (models for
these figures) (209).

Remains of frescoes in the sepulchral chapel under the staircase; on the back wall Christ as the
Man of Sorrows with Mary and John (half-figures), on each of the side walls a saint from the
14th century.

Underground room beneath the Rucellai Chapel: accessible from the Cappella della Pura, cf.
p.704 and note 136.

Eastern transverse arm, continuation.
East wall. Crib, 1st half of the 19th century (210). Fragment of the wall tomb of Fra Corrado
della Penna dei Gualfreducci di Pistoia, Bishop of Fiesole (+1312 or 1313): Relief panel with the
recumbent bishop and two Dominicans; successor to Arnolfo di Cambio, c. 1312/13 (211).

First right nave choir.
Originally under the patronage of the Brotherhood of the Laudesi di S. Maria Vergine, founded
by St. Peter Martyr in 1243. Acquired in 1335 by the heirs of Messer Riccardo di Riccio Bardi,


called Califfo, and consecrated to St. Gregory (212). Over two hundred years later, a cult of St.
Dominic was established here. At the beginning of the 20th century, the chapel became a
sacramental chapel, and a little later it was consecrated to Our Lady of the Rosary.

Wrought iron grille, mid-18th century (213). Stone relief in the right pillar of the entrance
arcade, St. Gregory with a donor, dated 1335.

Vault frescoes, Assumption of St. Dominic, by Pier Dandini, mid-18th century (214); stucco work
from the same period.

Wall frescoes. Older layer preserved in faded traces: Madonna enthroned in the right arched
field, opposite St. Bishop(?) enthroned between two angels; further down on the walls here and
there Byzantine ornaments; from the circle of Cimabue, late 13th century; uncovered in 1906
(215). Younger layer, scenes from the legend of St. Gregory; on the two main walls: the Sick
Church Father Dictates Dialogues; St. Gregory, fleeing to Rome, is Appointed Bishop; St.
Gregory Surprised in Prayer on the Hill of Scauro; St. Gregory Preaches in Rome against the
Donatists and Arians; further remains on the window wall. Medallions with bust portraits of
prophets and saints all around the frame; youthful work by Giovanni dal Ponte (?), around 1400
(?). Uncovered in 1906 (216).

Early Gothic marble niche in the right wall, probably intended for altar devices; probably the
oldest Gothic magnificent biforium in Florence; uncovered in 1906 (cf. p. 685).

Altar table; the rear part perhaps from the 17th century (made of colored marble): Tabernacle
and rich paliotto (made of pietra dura) probably from the end of the 18th century (217/218).
Altarpiece, Madonna of the Rosary, by Giorgio Vasari, with the help of Jacopo Zucchi.1569/70;
placed here in 1906 (219).

Second right side choir.
Originally apparently consecrated under the patronage of the Bardi and John the Evangelist, sold
by Bernardo Bardi to Paolo d'Antenio &Mlesser Zanobi da Castagnola in 1356 (220). Then
owned by Boni and consecrated to Jeh. d. T. Acquired by Filippo Strozzi from the Boni in 1486
and probably dedicated to St. John and the Apostles Philip and James (221); since then under the
patronage of the Strozzi.

Frescoes. On the walls scenes from the legend of St. Philip and St. John the Evangelist as well as
allegorical figures of virtues and muses, the interpretation of which is not possible everywhere;
in the vault Old Testament figures; late major work by Filippino Lippi. Important as the first
example of monumentally unified wall decoration in the sense of the High Renaissance and as
the most significant testimony to the painter's study of antiquity, certified by Vasari (222);
commissioned by Filippo Strozzi on 21.4.1487, worked on until 1489, then abandoned,
completed according to the inscription in 1502; inscribed; restored in 1753 and 1861, generally


well preserved (223). Right wall: Crucifixion of St. Philip in the arched field; in the main field:
St. Philip driving a dragon from the Temple of Mars in Jerapolis, who has just killed the king's
son with his poisonous breath. Window wall: fantastic triumphal arch architecture, chiaroscuro
painting, with rich ornamentation, angels, women holding coats of arms; on the left the muse
Parthenice and Caritas, on the right Fides and Polyhymnia (?) (225), as well as a second muse at
an altar. Left wall: in the arched field the Martyrdom of St. John the Evangelist, in the main field
the Revival of Drusiana by John. In the vault caps the four patriarchs Adam, Noah, Abraham and
Jacob; by Filippino Lippi and workshop, allegedly executed in part by Raffaellino del Garbo
(224).

Other furnishings. In the window of the back wall, a stained glass painting, Mary with St. Philip
and St. John the Evangelist, designed by Filippino Lippi, from the time of the frescoes (226). In
the wall behind the altar table,, tomb of the founder Filippo Strozzi (††1491), llatete work by
Benedetto da Maiano, 1491 in progress, completed in 1493 (?) (227), flat round-arched niche
with finely ornamented frame strip on wide marble. Therein the sarcophagus of black marble
with two cherubs in relief and the round relief of the Madonna in the rosary, surrounded by
flying angels, made of white marble. - Floor from 1261 (228).

Main choir chapel
Dedicated to the Virgin Mary; patronage originally held by the Ricci family; the chapel was
nevertheless later furnished by the Tornaquínei, then by the Tornabuoni. Patronage of the high
altar was held by the Sassetti (229).

Frescoes. On the walls scenes from the life of the Virgin Mary and from the legend of John the
Baptist, in the vault the four Evangelists; famous late masterpiece by Domenico del Ghirlandaio
and his workshop; commissioned by Giovanni Tornabuoni to the brothers Domenico and Davide
del Ghirlandaio on 1.9.1485, unveiled on 22.12.1490 (inscription on the Annunciation to
Zacharias) (230). Domenico's collaborators, especially on the upper parts: Davide del
Ghirlandaio, Mainardi, Bartolommeo di Giovanni and Benedetto del Ghirlandaio (?). Cleaned in
1907; new restoration underway since 1938(231) The frescoes are famous as a classic depiction
of Florentine patrician life in the time of Lorenzo il Magnifico; they contain many portraits. The
identification of individual persons is based on information provided in 1561 by Benedetto di
Luca Landucci, then eighty-nine years old, on the basis of his youthful memories (232).
Description (from bottom to top due to the order of the paintings): Right wall, in the lowest strip
on the right Annunciation to Zechariah, dated 1490, the Visitation; in the second strip on the
right Birth of John the Baptist, on the left his naming; in the third strip on the right Sermon of
John, on the left Baptism of Christ; in the arched field the Feast of Herod, window margin:
below the donors Giovanni Tornabuoni and his wife Franoesca Pitti; in the middle strip on the
left Annunciation to Mary, on the right St. John in the Waste; in the upper strip on the left
Burning of the Catechism by St. Dominic, on the right Death of St. Peter the Martyr; in the
border Coronation of Mary; left wall; in the lowest strip on the left Expulsion of Joachim from
the Temple (with the painters' biographies), on the right Birth of Mary (inscribed Bighordi


Grillandai); in the second stripe on the left of the temple passage, on the right, The Marriage of
Mary; in the third stripe on the left, the Adoration of the Magi, on the right, the infanticide; in the
arched field, the Death and Assumption of Mary.

Stained glass in the three windows of the back wall. Left and right windows: in the upper three
panels, St. Peter and the Apostles in tabernacles (on the left St. Peter, St. John the Baptist,
Dominic, on the right St. Paul, St. Lawrence, St. Thomas Aquinas), in the lowest field a wreath
of fruit carried by putti surrounding a lion's coat of arms on a green field (largely renewed in the
right-hand window), middle window: at the top Donation of the Belt to St. Thomas the Apostle,
underneath the incision and Miracle of the Snows at St. Maria Maggiore in Rome; the lowest
field is white glazed. Executed by Sandro di Giovanni d'Andrea Agolanti, 1491 (233), after a
design by Domenico del Ghirlandaio.
Choir stalls. The upper row of seats is the youthful work of Baccio d'Agnolo, completed in 1490
(234); it was probably originally a circumferential bench with a smooth back wall enlivened by
pilasters and inlay work. Disfigured by additions: Armchairs and folding seats, made in 1566 by
Giovanni Gargiolli on behalf of Vasari (when the monk choir was relocated) (235). The large
music stands are a few decades younger.

White marble Easter candlestick (on the left triumphal arch pillar) in the form of a twisted
column with foliage and putti in the coils; an outstandingly beautiful work from the last third of
the 14th century, attributed to Piero di Giovanni Tedesco (236); probably more in the style of
Simone di Francesco Talantí. The Easter Leaper is a subsequent imitation by Giovanni Battista
Giovanmerzf,1804(7) (237).

High altar.
Neo-gothic beginning of colored marble, removed by Enrico Romoli, sculptures by Egisto Rod,
1857|61. Wooden cross, good work of the beginning of the 16th century (238). Painting,
Resurrection of Christ, on gold ground, by Giuseppe Fattori, 19th century, around 1861 (239).

Western transept
First left side choir.
In 1264 (7) Fra Ranieri, known as il Greco, may have established a cult here to his patron saint,
St. Luke. In 1325, the chapel was acquired by Margherita Tornaquinci, who belonged to the
Guardi and Scali families; since then it has been called Cappella Scali. In 1461 it was ceded to
the della Luna family by Donna Costanza de' Salviati, widow of Bartolommeo degli Scali; this
agreement was annulled in 1466. In 1503 the chapel was transferred to Leonardo, Giovanni and
Federigo Gondi, the sons of Giuliano Gondi (240). In 1508, Giuliano da Sangallo had it extended
on their behalf.
In the vault, remains of the old painting, the four Evangelists; by a Byzantine painter, around
1270, probably donated by Fra Ranieri; uncovered in 1932 (241).


Target architecture by Giuliano da Sangallo, c. 1503/08; added in 1602 (cf. p. 689f.). In the pair
of niches in the altar wall, two statues of angels, by Francesco Gargiolli (?), around 1602 (242).
In the center, a wooden crucifix by Filippo Brunelleschi; a famous masterpiece of early
Renaissance sculpture, allegedly created to surpass Donatello's crucifix in S. Croce, but probably
created earlier than the latter, around 1400/1410 (234).

Western Crossarm
First left side choir.
In 1264 (?), Fra Ranieri, known as il Greco, perhaps established a cult here to his patron saint, St.
Luke. In 1325, the chapel was acquired by Margherita Tornaquinci, who belonged to the Guardi
and Scali families; since then it has been called Cappella Scali. In 1461, it was ceded to the della
Luna family by Donna Costanza de' Salviati, widow of Bartolommeo degli Scali; in 1466, this
agreement was annulled.

In 1503 the chapel was transferred to Leonardo, Giovanni and Federigo Gondi, the sons of

# Giuliano Gondi (240). Giuliano di Sangallo was commissioned by them to enlarge it in 1508.

Frescoes. Remains of the old painting in the vault, the four evangelists; by a Byzantine painter,

# around 1270, probably donated by Fra Ranieri; uncovered in 1932 (241).

Decorative architecture by Giuliano da Sangallo, c. 1503/08; added in 1602 (cf. p. 689f.). In the
pair of niches in the altar wall, two statues of angels, stucco, by Francesco Gargiolli (?), c. 1602
(242). In the center, a wooden crucifix by Filippo Brunelleschi; a famous masterpiece of early
Renaissance sculpture, allegedly created to surpass Donatello's crucifix in S. Croce, but probably
created earlier than the latter, around 1400/1410 (234).
Second left side choir.
Apparently dedicated to St. Dominic; the patronage was given to the Falconi family early on;
they consecrated the chapel to St. Michael the Archangel and all the angels. In the 16th century,
the patronage was given to the famous humanist Niccolò di Sinibaldo Gaddi. He had the chapel
consecrated to St. Jerome (243) and had it extended by Giovan Antonio Dosio (for the
architecture, see p. 690). Uniform furnishings around 1575/78.

Frescoes: the dome is divided by ornamental moldings into four aedicules and smaller ields; in
them fresco scenes from the legend of St. Jerome, also in the soffit of the entrance arch; in the
pendentives Virtues; all paintings by Alessandro Allori, dated 1577 (245).

On the side walls in the arch fields ornamental stained glass and blind windows; in the aedicules
marble reliefs, the Marriage and the Presentation of Mary, by Giovanni Bandini called
dell'Opera (246). Below, marble sarcophagi, tombs of Cardinals Taddeo Gaddi (t 1561) and
Niecolò Gaddi (+1552), dated 1577 and 1578(247). In the back wall, altarpiece, Resurrection
from the Daughters of Jairus, last work by Angelo Bronzino, 1571/72 (248). Below it, marble
sarcophagus, tomb of the wife (+ 1563) and two children (t 1564 and 1569) of Cavaliere Niccolò


Gaddi.Magnificent marble altar table on lion feet, below it the tomb of Blessed Remigius, dated

1577. Floor in marble and pietra dura.

The Strozzi Chapel
(in front of the west wall of the western transept).
Built around 1279. Original patrons: perhaps the Bracci family (?). Consecrated in 1284 under
the patronage of the Strozzi and St. Thomas Aquinas (249). Staircase and balustrade probably
remodeled in the 19th century.

Frescoes, famous depiction of the end of days, based on Dante's Divine Comedy; main work by
Nardo de Cione, around 1357; restored several times, most recently in 1950 (250). In the vaulted
caps of St. Thomas Aquinas with virtues, repeated four times. Hell on the right wall, the Last
Judgment on the altar wall, Paradise on the left wall. Beneath it, a plinth with engraved inset
fields and medallions with heads. In the the arch of the gallery are the four church fathers, on the
pilasters there are two St. Dominicans.
Glass painting in the window of the altar wall. Above the Madonna, below St. Thomas Aquinas,
both under canopies; perhaps after a design by the workshop of Nardo di Cione, created around
the same time as the frescoes; restored in 1861 (inscription behind the altar) (251).

Altarpiece, Pentaptych, main work by Andrea di Cione called Oreagua; inscribed; begun in 1354,
dated 1357 (252); restored in 1737 and 1861 (inscription behind the altar). Here, for the first
time, a uniform group representation was developed across all five panels and an attempt was
made to combine these panels into a single display wall. Christ is enthroned in the center and
hands the keys and book to St. Peter and St. Thomas Aquinas, who are kneeling next to him;
Mary, the Archangel Michael and St. Catherine of Alexandria stand to the left, St. John the
Baptist, St. Paul and St. Laurence to the right; on the predella, the rapture of St. Thomas Aquinas
at Mass, St. Peter Walking on the Sea, and the trilogy from the Legend of St. Lawrence: The
intervention of St. at the weighing of souls by the angel Michael (left), saving the soul of
Emperor Henry II (with the death depicted in the center), and the devil fleeing past a hermit with
the handle of the chalice to be weighed (right).

The burial chamber under the staircase (for members of the Rossi de'Strozzi family).
On the façade, crude spandrel reliefs, 1st half of the 14th century (252a); inside, frescoes, the
Entombment on the back wall, two saints on each side wall; in the style of Niccolò di Pietro
Gerini, around 1400 (253).

The Rucellai Chapel of All Saints
(on the west wall of the western transept, under the bell tower).
The oldest chapel of the church, c. 1246ff (cf. p. 685); also called Cappella del Campanile.
Outside, over the entrance, Fresco, Coronation of the Virgin with Angels (14th century).(254).
Next to the door, beautiful holy water font in marble with the name of Andrea Rucellai (1464).


Interior frescoes, scenes from the New Testament, by Pacino di Bonagzida, 1st half of the 14th
century; very worn, but hardly overpainted (255). The structure takes into account the buttress of
the transept. On the vault, the Lamb of God; on the right wall, Christ enthroned, St. Luke and St.
John enthroned; on the back wall, fragments of the Annunciation, including remains of St. Luke;
on the left wall, the only remaining enthroned Evangelist (a second Evangelist was destroyed
during the construction of the bell tower's spiral staircase) St. Christopher on the buttress, 2nd
half of the 14th century (256).

Stanza dei Beati
(behind the Chapel of All Saints; cf. note 122a).
Gothic room probably from around 1330. On the west wall bust of St. Anthony of Padua, richly
framed, dated 1628. On the south wall large altarpiece, Marriage of St. Caterina de' Ricci, by
Giuseppe Fattori, inscribed and dated 1852 (257). On the east wall, marble bust of St. John of
Salerno, the founder of the S. Maria Novella branch, dated 1650.

Sacristy
(in front of the south wall of the western transept).
Dedicated to the Annunciation of Mary; patron saints: Cavalcanti; portal by Gherardo Silvani or
Fabbrizio Boschi, 1616 (see p. 691). Interior built for Mainardo Cavalvanti by Fra Jacopo
Talenti, mid-14th century (for the architecture see p.691).
Vault frescoes, ornaments, 14th century (?); heavily renovated (258).
Entrance wall (inside). To the right of the entrance, wall fountain of glazed terracotta, early work
by Giovanni della Robbia, 1497 (259):
Arcade, framed by two omamented pilasters, covered by an architrave and crowned by a round
pediment; in the arched field Half-figure of Madonna with child, by worshipped by angels, Putti
holding a garland above; in the arcade a marble basin, a (late), marble slab and two heads of
angels.-Left of the entrance, Wall fountain, marble work by Giovacchino Fortini, early 18th
century (260). - Above the door two small panels, Adoration of the Magi and Entombment,
Lombard (?), c. 1500 (261). - Plague Madonna. Panel painting, enthroned Madonna with St. John
the Baptist and Antonica Abbot, early 15th century; heavily overpainted (262). Small panel
painting, Mary and Christ enthroned with seventeen Dominican saints; under the influence of
Orcagna and Bernardo Daddi, probably around 1360 (after 1336) (263). Large painted panel,
crucifix, Mary and John (half-figures) at the ends of the crossbeam; an early work by Giotto,
perhaps painted before 1300, certainly before 1312; until a few years ago, inside above the main
portal of the church (264).

Right-hand side cabinets, allegedly by "Guerrino Veneziani", 18th century (265). - Above
altarpiece, Conversion of St. Paul, by Sebastiano da Cortona (?), early 17th century (266). Next
to it, Baroque window, 18th century. Next to it, altarpiece, Baptism of Christ, by Jan van der
Straet, called Giovanni Stradano, around 1570 (267).


Large reliquary, designed by Bernardo Buontalenti, dated 1582 (268); slightly altered in the 18th
century to resemble the side cabinets; the paintings in the doors (Annunciation, St. Thomas
Aquinas and St. Dominic) by Camillo Perini, dated 1693 (269). In front of the altar table, 16th
century, and crucifix, attributed to Maso di Bartolommeo called Masaccio, second third of the
15th century (270). Above, three-part window with stained glass, scenes from the life of Christ
and John the Baptist, probably around 1330 by a master from the workshop of Antonio da Pisa,
perhaps after a design by Spinello Aretino (271).

Left-hand scroll wall, 18th-century cupboards, allegedly by Guerrin Veneziani (cf. note 265).
Above it, on the right, panel painting, Crucifixion, surrounded by virtues and vices after the
vision of St. Anselmus, by Giorgio Vasari, 1566 (272). Next to it a stained glass window
from the 18th century – Altar painting (canvas). Sermon of St. Vincent Ferrer, by Per Dandini,
around 1700 (273)

Large table with compartments in the middle of the room, 16th century.
South edge of the western transverse arm.
At the corner of the side aisle, granite consecrated water basin supported by a white marble
scrollwork herm; vessel probably antique, perhaps Egyptian from the first imperial period (from
the treasure of Lorenzo il Magnifico); herm by a successor of Cellini, perhaps by Battista
Lorenzi, third quarter of the 16th century; donated by Leonardo Reguadori (274).

Left (western) aisle.
First bay (the altar was originally dedicated to St. Peter Martyr; in the 16th century under the
patronage of the branch of the Strozzi derived from Camillo and since 1596 dedicated to St.
Hyacinth) (275). Epitaph of Anna Pandolfini (t 1802). - Altarpiece, Vision of St. Hyacinth (Christ
and Mary appear, surrounded by angels and St. Dominic kneeling); by Alessandro Allori,
inscribed and dated 1596 (276).

Second bay (since 1565 an altar of St. Catherine of Siena here; patrons: the brotherhood of this
saint) (277). Marble bust of St. Joseph Ignatius Zenobi del Rosso (+ 1731), by Giovanni Battista
Giovannozzi, around 1800 (278). At the altar, a richly carved, modern gilded wooden display
wall, around 1596; in the central niche, the statue of St. Catherine of Siena. St. Catherine of
Siena (from Cartapesta), by Domenico Atticciati after a design by Michelangelo Bandinelli,
around 1596 (279); on the sides and at the bottom is a painting (ground floor), scenes from the
life of St. Catherine, inscribed to Bernardino Poccetti, around 1596 (280). Neo-Gothic organ
façade above, designed by Enrico Romoli, 1857 (281); allegedly containing an organ by the
Dominican Fra Bernardo d'Argentina (282). - Marble bust of Josephus Ignatius Zanobi del Rosso
(d 1798). Nephew of the above, by Giovanni Battista Giovannozzi, around 1800 (cf. note 278).

Third bay (the altar had apparently been under the patronage of the Pasquali family since ancient
times (283); dedicated to St. Cosmas and Damian around 1565). The Resurrection of Christ,


painted by Giorgio Vasari between 1565 and 1568 for his friend Andrea Pasquali, the duke's
personal physician (284).

Fourth bay (Fra Lorenzo Cardoni is said to have erected an altar to the Holy Trinity here; since
around 1570 under the patronage of the Capponi family and dedicated to the Madonna of the
Rosary) (285). Altarpiece, Annunciation, last work by Santi di Tito, around 1602/03 (the angel of
the Annunciation is said to be a portrait of Virgilio Carnesecchi) (286). To the left, panel
painting, St. Lucia, by Davide del Ghirlandaio or Jacopo del Tedesco, painted in 1494 (?) for the
Brotherhood of St. Peter Martyr, commissioned by Tommaso Cortesi, who is depicted as the
donor (287). Tabernacle frame from the time of the painting's creation.

Fifth bay (the altar was perhaps originally dedicated to St. Ignatius the Dominican martyr, under
the patronage of the Benintendi; since around 1570 under the patronage of the Bracci) (288).
Triptych, Archangels Raphael and Tobias between a Dominican saint and St. Catherine of
Siena; follower of Castagno, c. 1460/70 (289); frame from the time of the painting's creation;
altarpiece, Christ and the Samaritan woman at the well, by Alessandro Allori, inscribed and
dated 1575 (290). Panel, Annunciation, by Neri di Bicci, 1455 (291).

Sixth bay (patrons of the altar: originally the Mazzinghi family, called da Peretola, later Baccelli;
the latter dedicated it to the Baptism of Christ; shortly before 1755 it came under the patronage
of the Rieci family, who dedicated it to St. Caterina de' Ricci) (292). Marble mural tomb of the
jurist Antonio Strozzi (+ 1524 st. c.), erected by his wife, Antonietta Vespucci, around 1524;
designed by Andrea Berama da Fiesole, executed by Silvio Cosini (Madonna and reciter Engol)
and Maso Boseoli (left angel) (293). - Altarpiece,
Resurrection of Lazarus by Santi di Tito, labeled and dated 1576 (294). Marble tomb monument
of Priest F.Fontanio, 1821

The Cappella della Pura is treated inside the tour of the inside of the church.
Mitre of the St. Archbishop Antoninus; in a wooden bracket, gold-plated, 18th century (7). -
Crucifix, silver-gilt with the four Evangelists in silver, good work of the 17th century. Four bust
relics of female saints, two at the end of the 14th century, two in the middle of the 2nd half of the
15th century (or perhaps all from the early 16th century, an emphasized ancient type ?). - Cult
ware. Textiles of the 16th-18th century. - Paliatto, embroidered brocade with fourteen stories
from the teachings of the Virgin Mary, mid-15th century(295).

## CLOISTER

Chiostro Verde.
Probably built by Fra Jacopo Talenti, around 1350/60 (cf. p. 696f.) In the passageway; fresco on
the right, enthroned Madonna honored by two angels; in the manner of Fra Bartolommeo, early
16th century, almost extinct. Left fresco (above the door), Dominican saint, 18th century. Also
ten gravestones, 1.11. 19th century.


Loggia.
Frescoes. In the vault in each canopy a medallion with the bust of a Dominican saint, 14th or
15th century, partly replaced (296), On the walls on three sides depictions from three Old
Testament scenes, in terra verde, by Paolo Uccello and other contemporary painters, between
1430 and 1446. The round gallery begins because of the order of the picture contents at the
northeastern corner:
East wing (along the church). Here, the most important frescoes are the series by Ucello and
assistants. Three essential pieces are kept in the hall behind the refectory (Capitolo del
Nocentino, p.726). 1st bay: Staircase and door to the refectory
2nd bay: In the arched field, Creation of the animals and creation of Adam; under the Creation of
Eve and the Fall of Man, early works by Paolo Uccello, c. 1430/36, considered as auxiliary work
by others (299). -- 3rd bay: The arched field is empty (once here was Expulsion from Paradise,
work of Adam and Eve; by Paolo Uccello and assistants, c. 1430/36); below sacrifice of Cain
and Abel, death of Abel, from the circle of Uccello, c. 1430/40: very damaged (297) Fourth
Yoke: In the arched field, Lamech kills Cain, construction of the ark; below Entry into the ark
(very damaged); from the circles of Uccello, c. 1430/40 (297). - 5th bay: empty (formerly here
Flood and Noah's thanksgiving and shame, by Uccello, c. 1446). - 6 th bay: in the arched field and
under the remains of a depiction of the Tower of Babel; almost only the red preparatory drawing
on the lower plaster layer is preserved; in the style of Dello Delli, c. 1430/40 (298).-7th bay: in
the arched field remnants of richly dressed figures (saints?), in the style of Dello Delli, c.
1430/40 (298); only unrecognizable remains preserved at the bottom.

Southern wing.
The first five bays attributed to a master from the circle of Lorenzo di Niccolò, c. 1430; the
arched field of the sixth bay by a better master of the same period; the main part of the field
below by the hand of the master of the first bays (299). 1st bay: in the arched field, Abraham's
exodus; below, God's apparent rank before Abraham. - 2nd bay: in the arched field, separation of
Abraham and Lot; below, Abraham's victory over Lot's enemies, Abraham and Melchizedek
(frescoes transferred to canvas). 3rd bay: in the arched field, the visit of the three angels to
Abraham; below, the burning of Sodoaa, transformation of Lot's wife into a pillar of salt; very
destroyed. 4th bay: in the arched field, the expulsion of Hagar and Ishmael; below, Order for the
sacrifice and offering of Isaac. - 5th bay: in the arched field death of Sarah, acquisition of her
burial ground; below departure of Eliezer, Meeting with Rebekah at the well.-6th bay: in the
arched field Marriage of Isaac and Rebekah (almost alone in the preliminary drawing); under
death of Abraham (very damaged). Side door to the Museo del Risorgimento and refectory.

The side panel and the lower panel of the first bay by a conservative contemporary of Uccello,
who can be identified with Dello Delli, around 1430/40; the next bays in the style of the Rossello
di Jacopo Franchi, around 1430/40 (300); in the first bay a fresco from the 14th century. 1st bay:
in the arched field the birth of Jacob and Esau, sale of the firstborn; below Rebekah and Jacob,
Jacob's blessing; very damaged (301). - 2nd bay: in the arched field Jacob and Rachel, welcome


of Jacob by Laban; below, meal of Laban with Jacob and daughters, birth of Reuben. - 3rd bay:
in the arched field, Jacob's marriage to the maidservants; below, Jacob's farewell to Laban and
the division of the sheep. 4th bay: in the arched field, Jacob flees from Laban, Jacob is caught
up; below, God warns Laban, meeting of Jacob and Laban, search for the household gods. 5th
bay: in the arched field, the angels appear before Jacob, who sends messengers to Esau; below,
Jacob's battle with the angel, meeting with Esau. 6th bay: in the arched field, Jacob erecting an
altar, the robbery of Dinah; below, Jacob's sons avenge the robbery 7th bay: in the arched field,
crucifix with St. Dominic and St. Thomas Aquinas; from the succession of Giotto, mid-14th
century; very overpainted, especially the secondary figures (302). Door to the Chiostro Grande at
the bottom.

North wing. 1st bay: in the arched field fresco, half-figure of the Madonna and Child from the
circle of Duccio, 1st half of the 14th century; very overpainted (303); below frescoes,
Dominicans in niches, by Bernardino Poccetti(?), late 16th century (304); at the same time
probably also the curtain-raising angels next to the arched field. In front, altar made of pietra
dura, allegedly by the Dominican Pietro Tacca, early 18th century (305). 3rd bay: Entrance to the
Spanish Chapel.

Spanish Chapel.
Originally the chapter house and Corpus Christi chapel under the patronage of Buonamico di
Lapo Guidalotti (306); built by Fra Jacopo Talenti, around 1344 f. (cf. p. 697 and note 67); in
1566/67 the Spanish colony in Florence was given this room, where they had been holding their
meetings for a long time, as a chapel.; since 1592 it was consecrated to the Spanish national saint
Jacob of Compostella (307). Confirmation of the transfer in 1733 (Inscription in front of the altar
on the floor).
Outside on the door lintel: Reliefs, Death and ascension of St. Peter the Martyr, in the center, the
Guidalotti coat of arms. On the door lintel inside, remnants of frescoes.
Cycle of frescoes inside. Famous major work of scholastic thought painting, by Andrea Bonaiuti
da Firenze, 1365 ff. (303). The program is based on the "Specchio della vera penitenza" by Fra
Jacopo Passavanti, prior of S. Maria Novella († 1357) and testamentary executor of the founder
(309). Depicted in a sienese-flat, yet Florentine-tectonized style: In the vault, Christ and the
Disciples on the Sea of Galilee; Resurrection; Feast of Pentecost; Ascension. On the border strips
ornaments and half-figures of prophets and saints; on the entrance wall scenes from the life of St.
Peter Martyr; middle zone destroyed; at the top, the cloak and sermon against the heretical
bishop; at the bottom, from the right, the healing of a sick man, the resurrection of a drowned
man, a sick man pleading for healing, the martyrdom of St. Peter Martyr. On the right (eastern)
wall the church in conflict: above Christ in the mandorla, venerated by angelic hosts, hovering
over an altar with the Lamb of God; in the middle zone on the right the driving of the children of
the world, on the left the believers who are led by the Dominicans on the path of penance by
means of confession and enter paradise through the narrow gate; in the lowest zone, the church
(landmark: the Florentine cathedral - based on a model by Andrea Bonaiuti) (310), in front of it
representatives of the spiritual and secular authorities; to the right, St. Dominic's dispute with


heretics, in the foreground black and white "Domini canes" herding the sheep (= congregation)
and driving away the wolves (= heretics). On the northern wall, next to and above the entrance
arch of the choir chapel, the Carrying of the Cross, Crucifixion, Christ in Limbo in compositions
rich in figures. - On the left (western) wall the triumphant church, depicted during the Triumph
of St. Thomas of Aquin; the Saint is sitting on a powerful gothic throne, surrounded by the seven
virtues in the form of flying angels, at his feet the representatives of heresy, Sabellius, Averroes
and Arius, enthroned next to him are the holy writers, whose books Thomas commented on, Job,
David, Paul, Mark, John the Evangelist, Matthew, Luke, Moses, Isaiah, and Solomon; under this
upper row, four fringe figures sit on a richly decorated altar as personifications of knowledge; on
the right, those of the seven liberal arts (Trivium and Quadrivium), at their feet famous
representatives of their disciplines, at their heads personifications of the planets corresponding to
them, etc. ; on the left the representations of the higher sciences, namely from left to right those
of secular law, canon law, physics (or medicine) and the four disciplines of medieval theology,
accompanied at their heads by allegories (the seven gifts of the Holy Spirit?) and at their feet by
the representatives of the individual sciences. - The frescoes are in good condition; they were
cleaned and restored by Veraccini at the beginning of the 18th century (311). The plinth strip has
been partially renewed on the entrance wall and completely renewed in the window reveals
(312).
There are several tombstones in the floor: in the central axis, in front of the choir chapel, that of
the founder Buonamico di Lapo Guidalotti (f1355) (313); in the center, the tombstone of some
Spanish merchants, 1578; at the entrance, that of Andrea a Moneta (f 1598). On the left side the
marble and pietra dura tomb slab of Pietro Mantorio (d 1584), on the right side the marble tomb
slab of Battista de Burgos (+1591) (314).

Choral chapel. In 1592 the Spaniards emphasized the entrance with two piastres and an arch,
transformed the Gothic window into an oval opening and removed the ribs to make room for a
vault decoration (315). In the vault, frescoes, grotesques and medallions with scenes from the
legend of St. James, by Bernardino Poccetti, 1592 (317). - On the walls, frescoes from
Alessandro Alleri's Workshop, 1592; on the right wall, the Battle of Clavigo; on the side, St.
Vincent the Martyr and Isidor; on the side of the window wall, St. Dominic and Lawrence; on
the left wall, Sts. Vincenz Ferrer and Ermenegild. Middle image (Canvas): Martyrdom of St.
James, by Alessandro Meri, painted and dated 1592 (318).- In the center Marble crucifix by
Domenico or Giovanni Battista Pieratti, middle of the 17th century (319). - Altar table, house
stone, dated 1592; underneath, pietra dura plarze with inscription from 1597 (transfer of relics)
on it. Polyptych, enthroned Madonna with child and St. Peter, Job. the Evangelist, John the
Baptist. and Matthew (?), from the work of Bernardo Daddi; inscribed and dated 1344 (319); in
the sacristy allegedly a painted crucifix, 12th century (2); it is unclear whether it still exists
(320).

Loggia, continuation of the north wing,
Under the doorway to the Chiostro dei Morti fresco in terra verde, in the middle a skeleton of the
dead, on each side a floating saint; 15th century; on the wall to the right a fresco of St. Thomas


Aquinas in the Dominican pedigree; perhaps by Stefano, a pupil of Giotto, 2nd quarter of the
14th century; some parts have been replaced (321).

Passage between Chiostro Verde and Chiastro Grande.
On the west wall, Fresco, Death of St. Peter the Martyr, almost faded, c. 1298 (2) (321a).

# Passageway between Chiostro Verde and Chiostro dei Morti

Fresco remnants in the gable of the entrance balcony, standing Saint, under donor, 14th century.;
very damaged.- On both walls numerous tombstones and coat of arms plaques.- On the right wall
Stone relief, Half figure of Madonna and Child, c. 1300 (?).-On the left wall, stone relief,
Tabernacle with enthroned Madonna with child and donor couple, angel and Mary of the
Annunciation, above Salvator, 1st half of the 14th century. (322) - On both walls there is a fresco
of the Man of Sorrows, 14th century; very damaged. Also some other fresco remains.

Chiostro dei Morti.
Oldest part of the monastery (cf. p. 694f.). The rooms were closed off from each other by shear
walls for a long time and thus appeared more like chapels in earlier times than they do now (cf.
note 84).

St. Anthony's Chapel (double chapel on the right), dedicated to St. Anthony Abbas; patron saints;
in the 14th century Carboni, since 1552 or 1558 da Magnale (Magnioli"?).
Frescoes: on the south wall Burial and Temptation of St. Anthony Abbas, on the east wall
Crucifixion of Christ and Saints, on the north wall Prayer on the Mount of Olives (7), St.
Anthony, Christ scene; in the style of Gherardo Starnina, around 1400 (?); very worn; the ceiling
painting partly modern (323).

St. Anne's Chapel (double chapel in the next bay, dedicated to St. Anne; patrons: around 1291 da
Quinto, in the 14th century Steccuti (324); frescoes: The Temple of Mary, St. Dominic, Christ
(or Evangelist Luke?), Nativity of Mary, Encounter at the Golden Gate, St. John the Evangelist,
St. Thomas Aquinas, St. Thomas Aquinas (?), Annunciation to Joachim; by a pupil of Orcagna
(Nardo di Cione?), after 1360 (?); restored (325).- In the center, a large stucco and marble
monument to Giovanna Strozzi Ridolfi, née Antinori (+1848); on the narrow side, two marble
reliefs, The Creation of Eve (right), 15th century, and Adoration of the Shepherds (left), 16th
century.

Chapel of St. Paul (in the next bay); initially dedicated to St. Paul, later to St. Julian (7); patrons:
Alberti, in the 14th century Betti (326). Frescoes: St. Julian carrying a pilgrim through the water
with his wife; St. Julian standing; Crucifixion with Mary and John seated; St. Dominic. On the
opposite wall, the Resurrection of Christ and the three women at the altar.


All from the school of Orcagna (Nardo di Cione?).om 1360(327). Many old and modern tomb
slabs.
On the north wall, stone relief, life-size half figure of the Man of Sorrows, 14th century (328). -
On the west wall, window with painted reveal, 14th century.
Amieri chapel, remains (?). In the north wall of the north cloister wing, the outer wall of the
chapel, which was dedicated to St. Thomas Aquinas and was under the patronage of the Amieri,
is perhaps preserved in the 2nd bay. In the arch field of the door fresco, half figure of St. Thomas
Aquinas, School of Orcagna (?), third quarter of the 14th century (329). - Tombs.
In the same northern cloister wing, fresco, Madonna with Child and St. Therese, by an unknown
painter. Therese, by an unknown painter, 1825 (tomb inscription below). - Tombs and sculpture
fragments.
On the west wall, altar with glazed terracotta relief, Noli me tangere, by Giovanni della Robbia,
first quarter of the 16th century (330) - altar table and marble sarcophagus, by F. Alessandro
Capocchio (+ 1581). Stone statue of Blessed Giovanni da Salerno, by Giro-lamo (?) Ticciati,
1735 (331).

Strozzi Chapel (at the southwest corner of the cloister), dedicated to the Assumption of Mary;
patron saint: Strozzi. Donated by Beatrice Strozzi-Trinciavelli, around 1330 (332). Frescoes: in
the vault bust portraits of four prophets; in the soffit of the entrance arch the four evangelists and
St. Benedict and St. Leonard (very worn and repaired). On the west wall, a field of arches with a
figural crucifixion; on the south wall, the Nativity (both frescoes have apparently been restored);
by a painter from the circle of Maso di Banco; mid- 14 th century. (333). Gravestones from the 19th
century.

Passageway between Chiostro dei Morti and Chiostro Grande.
On a wall that served as a rood screen in a three-part room (the former hospice), frescoes: the
Madonna and Christ enthroned; farther on, friezes of kneeling believers; the Nativity; Mary of
the Annunciation; attributed to Dello Delli, around 1446; commemorated in 1933/34 (334).

Passage between the Chiostro Verde and the refectory.
Traces of fresco decorations from the 13th century.

Refectory.
Anteroom. Traces of decorative painting, late 13th century, close to the saddleback corner of the
Chiostro Verde (see note 55).
Main room, probably built by Fra Jacopo Talenti, around 1350 60 (cf. p.697f.). On the east wall
a large panel painting, The Last Supper, by Alessandro Allori, 1581-84, inscribed and dated 1583
(335). Panel painting, Crucifixion; perhaps by Michele Tosini, 2nd half of the 16th
century(?)(336).On the north wall fresco, Enthroned Madonna with child and donor in
Dominican costume, with St. John the Baptist and St. Peter Martyr, Dominic and Thomas
Aquinas; in the style of Gherardo Starnina, around 1400 (337). Surrounded by a fresco,


Mannalese, by Alessandro Allori, inscribed and dated 1597 (333); the Madonna fresco was long
covered by the painting of the Last Supper by Allori, which now hangs on the east wall.
On the west wall is a painting of St. Dominic healing a sick man, 18th century. Painting of the
burning of a brook on a Dominican friar, by Ranieri del Pace, inscribed and dated 1716.
Painting of the Last Supper, 16th century (?).
Cloaks with ecclesiastical vestments. Four suits of armor, marble fireplace, 1675 (inscription).

Capitolo del Nacentino
(Room behind the refectory).
Built in 1343/08 (cf. p. 697 and note 56); dedicated to the Adoration of the Magi; temporary
location of three frescoes by Paolo Uccello from the Chiostro Verde. On the south wall of the
arched field, the Expulsion from Paradise and the Work of Adam and Eve, designed by Paolo
Uccello and executed by assistants c. 1430/36 (formerly in the 3rd bay of the eastern wing).
Across from the arched field and the lower field, Flood (above). Noah's thank offering and
schame (below). Main works by Paolo Ucccllo, from 1444 (formerly in 5th bay of the eastern
wing), detached from the wall and on transferred to canvas in 1906/07 or 1909 by Fiseali (339).
Other features. On the west wall; on the left, at the top, roundel, St. Dominic with Francis,
counterpart on the top right, St. Thomas of Aquinas and Bonaventura; by Jacopo Vignali, mid-
17th century. (339a). In the center, roundel, two putti scattering flowers. Bottom left circular
image, God the Father. Bottom right roundel, apostle (340). On a cupboard on the sisal wall
Christ's head, copy after Giovanni da Bologna.

Chiostro Dati.
Built around 1424 (see p. 698 and note 72). Two arched panels with frescoes, Dominican scenes,
around 1600,

Chiostro Grande.
Loggia.
Accessible through the Scuola sottufficiale Carabinieri, Piazza della Stazione. Built 1303/40 with
additions in the 2nd half of the 15th century (p.698f.).

Frescoes. Cycle with major works by many late Mannerist and early Roccoco painters, painted
1570 - 84; only a few frescoes are younger (in the latter case the date is added to the description)
(341). Scenes from the life of the Dominican saints, depicted on 52 lunette-like wall panels,
which correspond to the vaults. Under the vaulted consoles are portraits of Dominicans. In the
vault ornamental paintings, repainted according to old traces by Galileo Chini, 1915 (341a). Each
number corresponds to one bay.

Eastern wing, right half. 1) St. Thomas Aquinas escapes from the stalking of a woman, assisted
by angels; by Cosimo Gamberucci. 2. No painting. 3. battle with the heretics in Florence at he
time of St. Peter the Martyr; by Lorenzo Sciorina (342).4 No painting. 5. St. Peter the Martyr


speaks with holy virgins.; by Benedetto Velio. -- 6. Christ in limbo; Early work by Lodovico
Cigoli (343).

Northern wing. Entombment of Christ, by Giovan Maria Butteri, Figure of Christ and Madonna
by Alessandro Allori (344). Vault paintings (Grotesques and passion scenes) by Cosimo
Gamberucci. -2. Tomb of St. Dominic; by Giovanni Balducci (345).-- 3. St. Dominic’s ascension
to heaven; by Gamberucci. --4. Death of St. Dominic; by Santi di Tito or Lodovico Buti (346).--

5. Final moments of St. Dominic; by Santi di Tito (346a). 6.Donation of S. Maria Novella to the
Blessed Giovanni di Salerno; by Gamberucci.-7.The Devil throws a stone at St. Dominic; by
who is saved by angels; by Cosimo Gheri.--8. No painting. -9. St. Dominic leads the devil into
the monastery; by Simone da Poggibonsi.-10.St. Dominic castigates himself; by Gamberucci. -
11. Painting above. - 12. Mary appears to St. Dominic; by Lodovico Buti (347). - 13 Angels
serving St. Dominic and his monks at the banquet; by Santi di Tito (348). -14. Christ before
Pilate; including Mary Magdalene and Martha; by Giovanni Baldueci (349).
Western wing. 1 Christ washing the apostles' feet. In the violent grotesque and passion scenes;
by Giovanni Baldacci (339).2. miracle of St. Reginald; by Ludovico Buti (351). - 3. St. Dominic
heals a sick woman; by Lorenzo Sciorica (352).4. St. Dominic carries the image of the Madonna;
by Ludovico Buti. 5. St. Dominic carrying the nephew of Cardinal Orsini; by Alessandro Fei,
called del Barbirre. 6. St. Dominic carrying the mason's ban of S. Sisto in Rome; by Benedetto
Velio. -7. the St. Dominicus raises a child; by Butteri (353).-8. The apostles Peter and Paul
appear to St. Dominic; by Santi di Tito (354). - 9. St. Dominic inherited the order of Pope
Honorius I11. Confirmed early work of Gregerio Pagani (355). Confession of St. Francis and St.
Dominic; by Santi di Tito (356).-11.Vision of Pope Gregory IX of Simone da Poggibonsi, -12.
Pilgrims saved from the shipwreck by St. Dominic; by Santi di Tito (357)--13.-18. Painted by
Bernardino Poccetti (358): 13. St. Dominic preaches on the crusade,:14. An orthodox book
spared by the flames, a heretical one consumed.; 15. St. Dominic converts heretic women; 16. St.
Dominic sells his library. 17. Birth of St. Dominic; 18th Anniversary of the Apostles. All
frescoes renewed in the 18th century by Agostino Veracini (359), 1. Birth of Christ; in the vault,
Passion scenes; by Giovanni Baldueri (360). - 2 nd and 3rd: no painting. -4. St. Catherine of Lima;
by Francesco Bambocci, around 1730; 5. St. Catherine of Siena converts two people who were
sentenced to death; by Giovanni Battista Paggi (361). - 6. death of St. Anthony; by Giovan Maria
Butteri (362).-7. St. Anthony reproaches false blind people: by M. Soderini, around 1730 (362a).
- 9) St. Anthony as an envoy from Florence before Pope Pius II; by Giovanni Maria Casini. 10)
St. Anthony heals a child of the House of Tempi; by Benedetta Velin.-St. Anthony taking
possession of the Archbishop of Florence; by Giovanni Balducci (363).12. No painting.13.
Miracle of St. Vincent Ferrer; by Bernardino Menaldi, 1607 (364).14. David and Isaiah with the
effigies of the dukes Ferdinando I and Francesco I; by Alessandro Fei, called del Barbers.14.
Putti in the arched field; by Giovan Maria Butteri (365).

Eastern wing, southern half. 1. Christ as Gardner and Maria Magdalena, by Giovan Maria
Butteri, 1581 (366); on the vault passion scenes, the southern one by Butteri, the others by
another student of Allori. -2.St. Vincent Ferrer heals the sick; by Cosimo Gamberucci.-3. Sermon


of St. Vincent Ferrer; by Giovan Mara Butteri (366).-4. Clothing of St. Vincent Ferrer; Early
work by Lodovico Cigoli (367). - 5. St. Thomas of Aquin teaching; by Lodovico Buti (368).-6.
St. Thomas von Aquin strikes Pope Urban IV. the celebration of Corpus Christi before; by
Mauro Soderini, c. 1730 (369).-7. No painting.-8. St. Thomas of Aquin on the board of kings
from France; by Antonio Pillori, c. 1730 (370).


_Pope’s Chapel_
In the west side of the north wing, upper floor. Fresco painting in honor of Pope Leo X (Medici),
by Jacopo Pontormo and Andrea Feltrini, commissioned and partly designed by Ridolfo del
Ghirlandaio, since 1515 (371). On the ceiling, central medallion with God the Father, surrounded
by medallions with angels holding instruments of suffering, as well as angels and grotesques
associated with the Medici motto; designed (?) by Ridolfo del Ghirlandaio, executed by
Pontormo and Feltrini (grotesques), 1515. Above the door in the arched panel, St. Veronica with
the sweat cloth; major work by the young Pontormo, c. 1516. On the opposite altar wall, arched
field with the Coronation of the Virgin, executed by a pupil of Ridolfo del Ghirlandaio, probably
created in the twenties of the 16th century. Grotesques on the side walls, probably executed by
Andrea Feltrini. All heavily restored, partly by Conti.

**_Museo del Risorgimento_**
Cf. Guida del Touring-Club Italiano, 1937, 262. –Most of the rooms used to be the infirmary (cf.
above p. 699 and fn. 54).

_Sacristy of the former St. Nicholas Chapel_
(accessible from Museo del Risorgimento)
Located at the Chiostro dell'lnfermeria. Belonged to the pharmacy in the 18th/19th century.
Patrons of the Chapel of St. Nicholas: Acciaioli; built c. 1332/34 (see p. 669f. and p. 699).
Fresco cycle, _Scenes from the Life of Christ_ ; from the workshop of Spinello Aretino, perhaps by
Mariotto di Nardo (?), late 14th century; restored in 1848 (372). In the vault, ornamental strips
with the bust portraits of the four evangelists in the vault caps (painted over). On the right wall in
the arched field _Crucifixion_ , at the bottom left _Entombment_ , on the right _The Three Women at the
Tomb_ , Noli me tangere. On the next wall in the arched panel, _Mocking of Christ_ , _Flagellation_ at
bottom left, _Carrying of the Cross_ on the right. On the window wall in the arched field, on the
left _Prayer on the Mount of Olives_ , on the right _Christ before Caiaphas_ (?), below left _Capture_ ,
on the right _Washing of Pilate's Hands_. On the entrance wall in the arched panel, _12-year-old
Jesus in the Temple_ , _Last Supper_ below left, _Washing of Feet_ on the right.

**Lost Features**
_The pre-Romanesque Chapel_
(before 983, demolished around 1350, see page 672)

Features unknown. Perhaps attached to it were the two _stone reliefs_ depicting Madonnas, which
are now located in the passage between the Chiostro Verde to the Chiostro dei Morti (see page
723f and note 322). – A _painted crucifix_ has also been associated with the chapel (373).

_The Romanesque Church_
(completed in 1094, demolished around 1279; see page 673)


_“Upper altar” (High altar?)_ , consecrated in 1094 to the Madonna and St. Agatha (see note 89).
Features unknown (perhaps a Madonna painting, in which the Madonna offers a representation
of the old Madonna seal of S. Maria Novella) (374).
_Side altar_ (in the crypt?), consecrated in 1094 to St. Stephen and Martin (see note 89). Features
unknown.
_Tomb_ of the blessed Johannes von Salerno († 1242), the founder of the Dominican establishment
of S. Maria Novella; most likely a wall tomb with sculpture and fresco painting erected soon
after his death; taken over to the current church during the demolition of the old church or newly
built there; replaced by the current tomb of Vincenzo Danti in 1571; lost (375).
_Frescoes_ in underground rooms (?) (376); lost.
Whether there were _choir screens_ is not discernible (see note 91); and whether a _painted crucifix_
was mounted on them must also remain undecided (see note 373).
No information is available about the features of any _side buildings_. They were probably rather
unremarkable (see page 673).

```
The current church
```
_Exterior.
Upper nave_. In the arches of the pointed arch friezes’ _fresco paintings_ , there are medallions with
half-figures of saints (traces are preserved on the west side).
_East side._ Next to the small church portal added by Vasari, a fresco of Madonna adored by St.
Therese, by Gaspero Martellini, first half of the 19th century (377); lost. – On the other (?) side
of this door, a _burial niche (Avello) with a fresco_ of St. Zenobius and St. Giovanni Gualberto
praying to the crucifix, 14th century. (378); lost.

_Interior_.
_In general._ The characterization of the condition before the interventions of the 16th and 19th
centuries in Wackernagel, Lebensraum, 1938, 56f. – The original features were dominated by
large cycles of frescoes and the powerful monastic choir, which grew together with the
architecture in the last two bays before the crossing. In addition to the frescoes, one must also
imagine the multitude of diverse altars in casual sequence, the organs, crucifixes, miraculous
images and tombs to get an idea of the variety of features as they had developed over the course
of three centuries.
_The fresco decoration_ originally covered much larger portions of the wall surface. The interior is
said to have been fully painted (379), but probably not according to a uniform plan; this is
contradicted by the variety in subjects painted and times of origins depicted. Apparently, the
painting was carried out under the initiative of individual families. Notably, the paintings mainly
extended to the areas where family altars stood. All choir chapels were painted throughout, but
perhaps not the Cavalcanti Chapel (Sacristy); also, many of the wall surfaces in the side aisles


and the facade well (380). Whether and where the cycle of frescoes with Old Testament scenes,
donated by Turino del fù Baldese in 1348, was carried out, cannot be determined (see note 379).
The frescoes were largely destroyed during the renovations of 1565 onwards.
Vasari erected _stone tabernacles_ in the two side aisles around 1565, composing an arrangement
for altar pictures; they were replaced after 1861 by the current neo-Gothic ones (381).
The _older floor_ , donated and possibly also made by Fra Minia Lapi (1321-76 in the monastery),
was replaced following 1861 (382). In it, arranged irregularly, is a large number of _tomb slabs_ ; in
1861, they were newly laid out in the current regular arrangement (383).

_Facade wall.
Altar_ west of the main portal (initially dedicated to the Holy Three Kings, later probably to the
Annunciation of Mary; patrons: del Lama, then Fedini, at the end of the 16th century
Mondragone, then in the 17th century Vecchietti ) (384). First decoration: marble altar with _panel
painting_. Adoration of the Holy Three Kings, by Sandro Botticelli; painted on commission from
Gasparre di Zanobi del Lama around 1475; now in the Uffizi, No. 882 (385). Above the altar (?)
_fresco_ , Birth of Christ, in the style of Sandro Botticelli, around 1470; following 1857 was
relocated to the arch field of the main portal on the facade wall, see there. – Second decoration:
on the altar since about 1603, the _painting_ of the Annunciation of Mary, by Santi di Tito, painted
for the Spaniard Fabio Mondragone; moved to the Gondi Chapel in 1861, now in the fourth bay
of the left aisle, see there. – In 1857/61, the altar was removed, and in its place, the fresco of the
Trinity by Masaccio was transferred.
_Altar_ east of the main portal (originally dedicated to St. Vincent the Confessor under the
patronage of the monastery; since 1576 under the patronage of the Attavanti, later the Ricasoli;
in the 18th century dedicated to St. Vincent Ferrer) (386). _Painting_ of St. Vincent Ferrer, above
Christ in Glory by Jacopo Coppi, known as del Meglio, now in the 5th bay of the right aisle (see
there). Replaced by the _triptych_ , the Archangel Raphael with Tobias and two saints, School of
Castagno; now in the 5th bay of the left aisle (see there). – In 1857, the altar was removed, and
the Annunciation fresco behind it was uncovered.

_Nave.
On a pillar_ to the right, a temporary _holy water font_ , 1300/02 (see note 414).
_In the third bay_ above the arches to the right and left, _frescoes_ , portraits of Andrea di Niccolò
Minerbetti (Gonfaloniere of 1387) und his wife Francesca; 2nd half of the 14th century (387);
lost.
_Bronze tomb slab_ of Lionardo Dati, by Lorenzo Ghiberti; now in front of the high altar (see
under Features, Nave).

_Monastic choir (388)_
Freestanding in the nave, created by enclosing the last two nave bays before the crossing, open
towards the main choir chapel (see page 674); wholly or partially clad with marble (390);


removed in 1565 by Vasari (see Architectural History). On top of the semi-high thick walls,
connected by a passageway, stood four altars, an organ, a lectern, and other features (see below).
The front side (“ponte”) was visibly higher than the flanks. The interior was accessible from the
nave through a large gated arch door, the “reggie,” framed by two altars, and from one side door,
a marble pilaster has perhaps been preserved in the tomb of Tommaso Minerbetti, now in the
fourth bay of the right aisle. Next to each side door outside, there was an altar. The altars on the
“ponte” were positioned against the pillars, facing each other, with their display sides toward the
interior of the choir; likewise, two additional altars, one on the eastern and one on the western
wall.

_Facade._ East of the entrance, an altar (dedicated to St. Mary Magdalene; patrons: Cavalcanti),
connected with the tomb of Blaxia Cavalcanti, the founder who passed away in 1300; in 1370,
the stone sarcophagus of the recently deceased Mainardo Cavalcanti was also linked to the altar
(392). Altarpiece, polyptych with the Annunciation in the center, saints in the side panels, and
Crucifixion, Flagellation, Resurrection in the three gables; on the predella, Pietà, Church Fathers,
and saints, as well as the coats of arms of the Cavalcanti and Acciaiuoli; probably created for
Mainardo Cavalcanti by Giovanni del Biondo around 1378 (?); following 1565, was transferred
to the sacristy along with the altar and tombs, since 1810 in the Academy, No. 8606 (393). –
West of the entrance, an _altar_ (dedicated to St. Peter Martyr, patrons: Castiglione-Dietisalvi),
erected in 1298, renovated in 1484 (394). Possibly an altar fresco here, the Martyrdom of St.
Peter Martyr, Byzantine-style painting, likely from around 1298; transferred to the passage
between Chiostro Verde and Chiostro Grande in 1572, see there page 723.
_East wall_ (exterior side). _Altar_ (dedicated to St. Thomas à Beckett; patrons: Minerbetti; founded
before 1308 (1298?) by Tommaso di Ruggierino Minerbetti) (395): Panel of unknown subjects,
by Gaddo Gaddi, end of the 13th century; probably removed around 1565, lost (396). Next to it,
probably the two _wall tombs_ of the Minerbetti, now in the 4th bay of the right aisle (see there);
relocated around 1572. – On the same wall, a _fresco or panel_ , St. Jerome, by Taddeo Gaddi, 1st
half of the 14th century (397); probably removed around 1565, lost. Adjacent is the burial place
of the Gaddi family.

_West wall_ (exterior side). _Altar_ (dedicated to St. Thomas Aquinas ; apparently erected in the 1st
half of the 14th century under the patronage of the Guaseoni; passed to the Alfani in 1365 and
dedicated to St. Mark; later as the Catherine Altar under the patronage of the Brotherhood of St.
Catherine of Siena) (398). At times (1494), the panel painting of St. Lucia, possibly by Davide
del Ghirlandaio (?), was likely located here, which is now in the fourth bay of the left aisle (see
there); in 1565, the altar was moved to the west wall of the side aisle; for further details, see the
2nd bay of the left aisle.

_Walkway_ on top of the wall: _Above the central portal_ , presumably the painted _crucifix_ by Giotto,
now in the sacristy, see there. – _On the eastern pillar_ , an _altar_ (dedicated to St. Louis, patrons:


Ardinghelli; apparently established simultaneously with the “ponte,” around 1300) (399).
Altarpiece, St. Louis of France, at the feet of the saint, the donor couple, by Giotto, around 1300
(400); probably removed around 1565, lost. – _On the western pillar_ , an _altar_ (dedicated to St.
Elizabeth of Hungary, patrons: Macci; erected around 31.1.1339 according to the last will of
Tignoso di Gulaterone de’ Macci; sold to Virgilio Adriani in 1437) (401). Features unknown. –
Next to the two previous altars, an _organ_ , donated around 1330 by Simone de’ Saltarelli,
Archbishop of Pisa; probably renewed or replaced after 1424. On the wings, paintings (panel),
Annunciation, by Fra Angelico, 1st half of the 15th century; removed in 1565, then in the lower
dormitory of the monastery, still present in 1790 (402); lost. – Nearby, likely a _marble lectern_ ,
supported by a sculpted column with Evangelist symbols; probably identical to the paschal
candelabra in the main choir chapel, see there. – _On the eastern side wall_ , in the rear bay, an
_altar_ (dedicated to St. Eustace; probably erected by the brothers Fra Tommaso and Fra Agostino,
sons of Tommaso Gherardini, 14th or 15th century) (403). Features unknown. – _On the western
side wall_ , in the rear bay, an _altar_ (dedicated to St. Peter and Paul) (404). Features unknown.

_Interior: seating_ all around, removed in 1565, lost. In the center, the _bronze tomb slab_ of
Dominican General Lionardo Dati by Lorenzo Ghiberti, now in front of the high altar, see under
Features, Nave.
There may have been additional altars on or in the monastic choir; see the features mentioned on
page 747f and note 468.

_Altar tabernacle_ in marble, erected after the destruction of the monastic choir on the _fourth
eastern pillar_ , commissioned by the sons of Marco Benedetti, designed by Bernardo Buontalenti,
end of the 16th century (405); crowned with a bust of Christ by Giovanni Caccini, around 1598
(406); within a frame, a painting, Martyrdom of St. Peter Martyr, by Lodovico Cigoli, end of the
16th century (407). The tabernacle was destroyed in 1857; the painting initially went to the
Rucellai Chapel, then to the storage of the museums of S. Salvi (408); the bust is lost.

_Altar tabernacle_ in marble, _on the fourth western pillar_ , counterpart to the previous one (patrons:
Anselmi); allegedly also designed by Buontalenti; crowned with a bust of the Madonna, by
Bartolomeo Cennini, end of the 16th century (409); a painting, St. Hyacinth kneeling before the
Madonna, by Jacopo da Empoli, end of the 16th century (410). Same fate as the previous
tabernacle.

_Right, eastern side aisle._

_First bay_. At the altar (dedicated to St. Lawrence; patrons: Giuocchi), a _fresco or panel painting_ ,
Legend of the Holy Cosmas and Damian, by Giottino, 2nd half of the 14th century (411);
removed or destroyed after 1565 (?); lost.


_Second bay_. Here formerly a large _fresco_ , Martyrdom of St. Maurice with the donor, Connetable
Guido di Giovanni, known as Camprese or da Campi, kneeling before the Madonna,
recommended by St. Dominic and St. Agnes, by a painter Bruno after the design of his friend
Buffalmacco, 1305; destroyed after 1565 (412). – _Tombstone_ of Guido da Campi with relief
images († 1312) (413).

_Third bay_. A Gothic _portal_ , around 1300; bricked up probably around 1570 (see page 680 and
notes 36 and 103a). In the tympanum above it (or on the north wall of the next bay?), around
1150, the _marble Madonna_ by Nino Pisano, now in the eastern transept, see there. Near the
portal, a _holy water font_ on a marble column, donated by Pagno Gherardi Bordoni, 1300/02; still
present in the 18th century (414); lost. – _Stained glass window_ with the coat of arms of the
Sommaia, around 1577 (415); lost.

_Fourth bay_. Here, perhaps the _wall tomb_ of the blessed Giovanni da Salerno († 1243), transferred
from the Romanesque church or newly erected around 1300; replaced around 1571 by the current
one (in the second bay), lost (see note 375).

_Fifth bay_. Altar of the Brotherhood di Gisù Pellegrino e del Tempio, _panel painting_ , The Raising
of the Lazarus by Santi di Tito, 1576, now in the sixth bay of the left aisle, see there. The
associated predella with unknown representations by Francesco Marucelli, lost (416). On or
above the altar, another _painting_ , God the Father by Santi di Tito (416); lost. However, neither
the _altarpiece_ , Lamentation of Christ by Fra Angelico, now in Museo S. Marco, nor the _panel
painting_ of the Pietà with the burial scene of a Brotherhood member, circa 1430, now in the
storage of the Uffizi (417). – On the wall further north, temporarily from 1579 to at least 1873,
the _tomb_ of Beata Villana, by Bernardo Rossellino and workshop, now in the second bay of the
right aisle, see there.
The altars and tombs leaning against the monk choir wall are discussed above under Monastic
Choir.

_Cappella della Pura_.
Enclosure of the miraculous image from 1677 to the late 19th century by a _painting_ , Angels and
the Holy Niccolò da Tolentino and Filippo Neri, around 1677 (418) lost. – _Altar table_ , around
1470/80; originating from the main choir chapel of S. Trinita and transferred back there between
1881 and 1897; see there. – Allegedly a _stained glass window_ , designed by Santi di Tito, 2nd
half of the 16th century (419); lost.

_Eastern transept._
Above the entrance to the Rucellai Chapel, _stained glass_ (?), donation of Orazio di Luigi
Rucellai, around 1600 (420); lost.


_Rucellai Chapel._
Towards the end of the 19th century, used as a king of museum for the church:
On the south wall: _Marble tomb_ of Beata Villana, by Bernardo Rossellino and workshop, now in
the second bay of the right aisle, see there. – Next to it, after 1857, the _tomb_ of the Blessed
Giovanni da Salerno, by Vincenzo Danti, now in the second bay of the right aisle, see there.
On the north wall: _Panel painting_ , St. Lucia, by Davide del Ghirlandaio (?), now in the fourth
bay of the left aisle, see there.

At an unspecified location: _Triptych_ , Archangel Raphael and Tobias and two Saints, School of
Castagno; now in the fifth bay of the left aisle, see there. – _Panel_ , Annunciation, by Neri di
Bicci; now in the fifth bay of the left aisle, see there. – Temporarily (around 1911), the _panel_ ,
Madonna and Christ enthroned with Dominican Saints. Mid-14th century, now in the sacristy,
see there. – Since 1861, the _painting_ , Death of St. Peter Martyr, by Cigoli, formerly on the fourth
right pillar of the nave, see p. 737. – Since 1861, the _painting_ , St. Hyacinth before the Madonna,
by Jacopo da Empoli, formerly on the fourth left pillar of the nave, see p. 737. – Around 1861,
_painting_ , the Crucifixion, by Michele Tosini, formerly on the pilaster between the first and
second right side choir, see there.

_Eastern transept, continuation.
East wall_. In place of the current nativity scene, _wall tomb_ of Fra Corrado della Penna, successor
to Arnolfo di Cambio; demolished in 1522; fragment inserted into the wall above the old location
around 1565, see Features. – Above it, temporarily, from about 1335-1677, _panel painting_ ,
Madonna Rucellai, by Duccio (?); now in the Rucellai Chapel, see there.

_First right side choir.
First decoration_ (Patronage: Laudesi Brotherhood): Frescoes, end of the 13th century, remnants
preserved, see Features. Altarpiece (until 1335), Madonna Rucellai, by Duccio (?); now in the
Rucellai Chapel, see there. Wrought-iron grille and benches, 1316 (421); lost.
_Second decoration_ (St. Gregory; Patronage: Bardi, since 1335): Frescoes, Legend of St. Gregory,
remnants preserved; see Features.
_Third decoration_ (St. Dominic, Sacrament Chapel): on the right side wall in the tympanum,
Pietà, by Domenico Passignano, late 16th or early 17th century; below, a large painting of
unknown subject by Giovanni Camillo Sagrestani with the assistance of Matteo Bonechi,
mid-18th century (422). – On the altar wall, a painting of an unknown subject, by Jacopo
Vignali, 1st half of the 17th century (423); on the sides, two small paintings by Pier Dandini, 2nd
half of the 17th century (424). – On the left side wall, in the tympanum, a painting of an
unknown subject by Pier Dandini, 2nd half of the 17th century; below, a large painting of an
unknown subject, by Giovanni Camillo Sagrestani with the assistance of Matteo Bonechi, mid
18th century (425). All removed in 1906, lost (426).


_Fourth decoration_ : temporarily here in 1908, the Plague Madonna, early 15th century, now in the
sacristy, see there.

_At the pilaster towards the second side choir.
Wooden crucifix_ from 1602 by Filippo Brunelleschi was located here, now in the first left side
choir, see there. – Later _painting_ , The Crucifixion, by Michele Tosini, 2nd half of the 16th
century, donated by the della Vigna family (427); identification uncertain.

_Second right side choir_.
In front of the chapel, _tombstone_ of Prior Fra Jacopo Passavanti († 1357) with relief figure; still
present at the end of the 18th century; lost (428).

_Main choir chapel_.
_Older fresco cycle_ , scenes from the life of Mary and the legend of John the Baptist; by Andrea
Orcagna, commissioned by the Tornaquinci family in 1348/50; destroyed in the late 15th century
(429); parts of the vault decoration had remained in the framing strips of the ribs and were
removed during the recent restoration in 1938/39.

_High altar_.
_First panel_ , donated by Fra Baro Sassetti (1264-1324 in the Order) (430); probably identical to
the _triptych_ that Ugolini da Siena provided for the high altar: Madonna between two saints,
removed in the 15th century, in the 16th century in the Spanish Chapel, later in the dormitory at
the Chiostro Grande; lost in the 19th century (431).
_Second panel_ (?). In 1429, Madonna Fiorana, daughter of Pellaio Sassetti, widow of Talano di
Luigi Adimari, left money for a new panel (432); whether her provision was carried out is not
certain.
_Third decoration_ , polyptych: carved frame structure, by Baccio d’Agnolo, completed in 1496
(433); paintings by Domenico del Ghirlandaio and his workshop. Domenico began the paintings
in 1486, presumably commissioned by the Tornabuoni, and left them unfinished upon his death
in 1496; they were completed by his workshop (including Davide and Benedetto del Ghirlandaio,
Mainardi, Granacci, and others); predominantly tempera painting (parts in oil painting, see
below); sold in 1804, now scattered. _Front side_ : in the center, Madonna in Glory with Saints
Michael and John the Baptist standing, Dominic and John the Evangelist kneeling (executed
according to Domenico’s design by Granacci or, according to others, by Davide, Benedetto, and
other students); on the _wings_ , St. Catherine of Siena (completed in oil painting) and Lawrence
(by Granacci or Mainardi); these parts are in the Alte Pinakothek in Munich, Nos. 1076, 1077,

1078. _Back side_ : in the center, Resurrection of Christ (schoolwork, by Benedetto Gh. and
Bartolommeo di Giovanni?); on the _wings_ , Saints Antoninus and Fincent Ferrer (by Granacci or,
according to others, by Davide Gh. with the assistance of Granacci; executed in oil); these parts
are in the Kaiser-Friedrich-Museum in Berlin, Nos. 74, 75, 76. Two additional _wings_ with Saints


Stephen and Dominic in the museum in Budapest and, in 1920, with Kleinberger in Paris. On the
_predella_ , allegedly Disputation of Stephen by Nicolaio, and scenes from the legends of Saints
Antoninus and Catherine of Siena by Granacci, Jacopo del Tedesco, and Benedetto Gh., lost
(434).
_Fourth decoration_. Altar structure in marble, designed by Giuseppe del Rosse, 1805; containing
the painting Assumption of the Virgin Mary by Luigi Sabatelli, 1804. In front of the altar, a
monastic choir made of colored marble with Ionic columns and marble figures, by Giovanni
Battista Giovannozzi, Stefano Ricci, Antonio Franzoni, and Gaetano Bini Bellucci (435).
Removed in 1861 (436). Fragments are in the Museo S. Marco, Chiostro de’ Salvestrini.

_Other features.
Tabernacle for the sacrament_ , behind the high altar; gifted by Fra Minia Lapi (1321-76 in the
monastery) (437); lost. – _Marble tomb_ of Tommaso Sassetti, last quarter of the 15th century;
never installed (438); lost. – _Floor_ made of colored marble, donated by Lionardo Baldesi, 1676
(439); destroyed. – Whether a _tomb or epitaph_ for Francesca Tornabuoni († 1477) was located
here is doubtful (see note 497).

```
Western transept.
```
_First left side chapel._
Patrons: Fra Ranieri, known as il Greco; Scali; Gondi (see under Features).
_Frescoes_. Famous primitive cycle attributed to the legendary Greek teachers of Cimabue,
probably donated by Fra Ranieri (in the order since about 1264) (440); remnants uncovered in
the vault around 1270; see under Features. Also attested on one wall, Christ surrounded by the
Evangelists, below Captain of Capernaum, the Sea of Galilee, the Calling of Peter (441); in the
arch of another wall, Madonna (442); whether these wall frescoes date from the same time as the
ceiling paintings is uncertain; the presence of the Peter legend makes it likely that they were
created after the transfer to the Scali (Guardi), around 1325 (443). Covered up with white wash
in the 18th century.

Altarpiece. _Madonna with Child and Saint_ ., underneath St. Lucas, by Simone Martini (?), 1st
half of the 14th century; missing. –Later, from 1861 to c. 1907, here the panels, _Annunciation
and Resurrection of Lazarus_ , by Santi di Tito, now in the fourth and sixth boys of the left aisle,
cf. there.

Marble tomb of Fra Jacopo da Castelbuono, bishop of Florence († 1286), c. 1286; removed in
1503 when the chapel was rebuilt (446); missing.

_Second left-side choir._
Patron: Falconi; Gaddi (cf. under decor).


Frescoes. In an arch (of the end wall ?), _the Fall of the Angels_ , by Giotto-Schiller Stefano,
second quarter of the 14th century (447); destroyed in 1574 ff. when the chapel was rebuilt.
First panel (?), St. Dominic, 13th century (?); still preserved in the 18th century, missing (448). -
Second panel, unknown depiction, by Giotto-Schiller Stefano, second quarter of the 14th
century; probably removed c. 1574 ff. when the chapel was rebuilt (449).
Large gilded wooden crucifix, by Taddeo di Francesco Curradi, 1st half of the 17th century;
missing (450).

_The Strozzi Chapel._
Supposedly frescoes by Buffalmacco, commissioned by Rossi Strozzi († 1316); subject unknown
(451); replaced by the present frescoes c. 1354.

_Stanza dei Beati._
Vault fresco, _Angels_ , by Jacopo Vignali, 1st half of the 17th century (452); lost. - Thirteen
portraits of the “Beati” of the monastery, including some by Jacopo Vignali, 1st half of the 17th
century and that of Jacopo Altoviti, by Alessandro Allori, late 16th century (453); missing.

_Sacristy._
Frescoes. Whether the walls were painted is questionable (454).
Original furnishings. Four reliquary tabernacles with paintings by Fra Angelico and his
workshop, before 1430; donated by Giovanni Masi († 1430); removed in the mid-19th century;
three paintings, namely the _Madonna della Stella_ , _the Annunciation with Adoration of the Magi_
and _the Coronation of the Virgin_ , now in the Museo S. Marco; the fourth, _the Death and
Assumption of Mary_ , in the Gardner Museum, Boston, U.S.A. (455). - Ivory panel with the
Passion of Christ (456); missing. - Cabinets were to be procured from funds bequeathed by the
Dominican general Lionardo Dati († 1424) (457). –For objects made of silver, gold, paraments,
etc., see Forschungen z. G. Florenz IV, 1908, 478-80.

Later additions. After 1565, the Cavalcanti altar with the polyptych by Giovanni del Biondo
stood temporarily on the south wall, originally in the monks' choir, see there. The Cavalcanti
tombs were also transferred with it. - The following paintings hung on the entrance wall until c.
1938: _The Last Supper_ , by Alessandro Allori, now back in the refectory as it was originally, see
there.

- To the side, two oval paintings, _St. Dominic and St. Francis_ , and _St. Thomas Aquinas and St.
Bonaventure_ , by Jacopo Vignali. Above them are two tondi, _God the Father_ and _the Apostles_ (?),
by Matteo Rosselli. These four paintings are now in the refectory as well, see there. - Between
the last two paintings, _Martyrdom of St. Stephen_ , by Matteo Rosselli, 1st half of the 17th century
(458); in the museums' stacks? - Above it, tondo, _Putti Scattering Flowers_ , perhaps by Matteo
Rosselli, now in the refectory, see there.


Underground room under the sacristy. Fresco painting in two layers, the older perhaps still a
remnant of the painting of the Romanesque church (located here), the younger probably 14th
century (459), destroyed.

Next to the door to the sacristy, _Fresco of St. Ignatius the Martyr_ , 14th century; painted for Fra
Michele de’Pilastri or for Angelo Monti degli Acciaiuoli (1317-1357), bishop from Florence
(460); lost. Altar (near the corner of the side aisle; dedicated to St. Dominic; Patron: Regnadori)
(461). Decor unknown.

On the corner pillar (or on the opposite aisle pillar ?) panel painting, _Pietà_ , above Christ between
Dominicans and members of the confraternity di Gesù Pellegrino, in the base B _urial Scene of a
Member of the Confraternity_ ; Florentine c. 1430; probably removed c. 1565, now in the Uffizi
storeroom (462).
Organ, donated by Simone de' Saltarelli, Archbishop of Pisa, c. 1330; perhaps on this wall, as the
Converses' Choir was located in the western transverse arm, perhaps also on the north wall or
inside the Converses' Choir (463); lost.

_Left, western side aisle_
First bay. On the altar (Patron: Strozzi) Painting, Crucifixion surrounded by Virtues and Vices by
Giorgio Vasari, 1566; now in the sacristy, cf. there –Predella of the late altar paintings ( _Vision of
St. Hyacinth_ from Allori), _Miraculous Scenes from the life of St. Hyacinth_ , by students of
Alessandro Allori, c. 1596; missing (464).

Second bay. Probably before Vasari's “reform”: Altar (dedicated to the Madonna dell'Umiltà,
mentioned in 1361) (465); decor unknown. In its place or in its vicinity, later tomb of Fra Jacopo
Altoviti, Bishop of Fiesole († 1430); removed in 1565, remains transferred to the Chiostro Verde,
next to the church staircase (466); missing. - Next to (?) altar (dedicated to the Coronation of
Mary). Here was perhaps originally the polyptych, _Coronation of Mary with Saints and Angels_ ,
from the workshop of Bernardo Daddi, mid-14th century; now in the Academy, no. 3449; with
predella panels by Fra Angelico (?), second quarter of the 15th century; missing (467). Next to it
an altarpiece by Zanobi Strozzi, mid-15th century (467); missing. - Next to the side door, f _resco
of St. Dominic, St. Catherine of Siena, St. Peter Martyr,_ by Fra Angelico, second quarter, 15th
century (468); lost. - Above the side door, white marble organ stand, by Baccio d'Agnolo,
perhaps c. 1490/1500; sold in 1859, main part now in the Victoria and Albert Museum in London
(469); other parts in the church at Rueil near Paris (470). Organ, by Fra Bernardo d'Argentina,
16th century (471); supposedly identical to the present one in the same bay.

Probably after Vasari's “reform”: Organ tribune as above, below it in the 18th century, a
Madonna painting of ancient style, probably _the Madonna of the Plague_ now in the sacristy


(472); also for a time, from about 1572 to 1870, the marble Madonna of Nino Pisano, now on the
sarcophagus of the Cavalcanti tomb in the eastern transept, cf. there. - In the door leading to the
Chiostro Verde, which was probably closed in 1571, under the organ, the wall tomb of St. John
of Salerno, from the workshop of Vincenzo Danti, 1571; here until 1857, now in the second bay
of the right aisle, cf. there. c. it, stucco work by Sebastiano Bandinelli, 18th century (?) (473).
_The Mortal Remains of the Blessed_ were kept here until they were buried under the high altar in
1861 (474).
The altars leaning against the wall of the monks' choir in these two bays are dealt with under
Monks' Choir.

Third bay. Tombstone of Pasquali (475) In the vicinity of the altar (Patron: Pasquali) Fresco,
Tomb of Beata Giovanna de Florentia, of the blessed Dominican tertiary, who lived c. 1333
(476); lost.

Fourth bay (patrons: Cardoni(?), later Capponi; cf. under decor). First decoration: fresco,
_Adoration of the Shepherds_ , 14th century. Remnants uncovered c. 1857 under the second
decoration (477); lost. - Second decoration: fresco, _Holy Trinity_ , painted by Masaccio above, c.
1427/28; found in 1857 ff. and transferred to the façade wall, cf. there. Perhaps a wooden
crucifix on the altar at the time, attributed to Maso di Bartolommeo called Masaccio, 15th
century, now in the sacristy, see there. - Third decoration: panel painting, _Madonna of the
Rosary_ , by Giorgio Vasari, placed in front of the Masaccio fresco in 1570; now in the first right
side choir, cf. there. Above it an oval painting, _Putti and Flowers_ (478), identification uncertain;
next to it two paintings by Lodovico Buti, 2nd half of the 16th century (479); lost.

Fifth bay. In the place of or in the vicinity of the late altar of the Bracci Altar (dedicated to St.
Ignatius the Bishop and Martyr; Patron: Benintendi). Painting of unknown object, underneath
funerary monument of Benintendi; removed c. 1565 (480); missing. Here perhaps the silver
plated bust of St. Ignatius the Bishop, c. 1500, now in Museo Nazionale (Bargello) (481).
Sixth bay. Tomb of Michael Benii Spinelli de Mazzinghis († 1430) and his descendants (482).
First decoration (Patron: Mazzinghi-Baccelli): Panel painting: Baptism of Christ by Jan van der
Straet (Stradano); removed c. 1755, now in the sacristy, cf there. –Second and third decorations
(Patron: Ricci): Painting, St. Caterina de’Ricci by Gaetano Romanelli, shortly before 1755,
probably removed c. 1852 (483); missing. Since 1852 Painting, Engagement of St. Caterina
de’Ricci by Giuseppe Fattori, labeled and dated 1852; removed after 1910, now in the Stanza dei
Beati, on the western crossarm, cf. there.

**_Church treasury._**
Embroidered paliotto with Coronation of Mary and Apostles, labeled by Jacopo di Cambio,
dated 1336; now in Palazzo Pitti, R. Museo degli Argenti (484). –Embroidered paliotto by Fra
Niccolo da Milano († 1367); still in existence in the 18th century; missing (485). –Embroidery


on a processional cross designed by Botticelli, 2nd half of the 15th century (486); missing.
–Reliquary for the finger of St. Peter the Martyr, 1466; missing (487).

**_At an unknown location._**
_Paintings._
Fresco cycle, Old Testament scenes, donated by Turino del fù Baldese in 1348; identification
uncertain (cf. note 379). - Frescoes, Encounter at the Golden Gate, scene in the temple (?), late
14th century; poorly preserved fragments now in the vestibule of the library of St. Mark (487 a).

- Panel, St. Dominic, 13th century (?) (cf. note 448); lost. - Large panel, depiction of the
Madonna, mentioned in 1312 in the will of Riccucchius Puccii; identical to the Rucellai
Madonna? (488). - Panel, Madonna with St., commissioned by Duccio in 1285; probably
identical to the Rucellai Madonna (cf. note 208). - Madonna panel, by Andrea Bonaiuti da
Firenze, 14th century, commissioned by the Petrus Martyr confraternity (489); lost. - Panel
painting, three Dominican saints (Dominic, Thomas Aquinas, Peter Martyr?) by Bernardo Daddi,
inscribed and dated 1338, donated by Guidonus Salvi and Domina Diana de Casimis; perhaps on
the monks' choir and removed in 1565 ff.; still preserved in a cloister in 1657 (490); four predella
panels with legends of Dominican saints are considered to be the remains of this altarpiece: 1.
Temptation of St. Thomas of Aquinas, Berlin, Kaiser-Friedrich-Museum, no. 1094. 2. St.
Dominic receives the book and cane (painted over as a sword ?) from St. Peter and St. Paul, New
Haven, Jarves Collection, U.S.A. 3. Miracle of St. Peter the Martyr during a sermon, Paris,
Musee des Arts Decoratifs. 4. St. Dominic rescues a shipwrecked man from distress at sea,
Poznan, Museum (491). –Polyptchon, Coronation of Mary with Saints and Angels, workshop of
Bernardo Daddi, now in the academy, nr. 3449; with predella panels by Fra Angelico? (cf. fn.
467). –Panel, Great Man of Sorrows surrounded by tools of suffering; with crowning and base
piece; in the style of Lorenzo Monaco or Fra Angelico, 1st half of the 15th century, now in the
Uffizi Gallery (492). –Panel, Annunciation, workshop of Fra Angelico, middle of the 15th
century, now in London, National Gallery (Uncertain origin from the church) (493). Easter
candlestick, with paintings by Fra Angelico, middle of the 15th century (494); missing. Rosary
picture by Giorgio Vasari for P.F. Angelo Malesti da Pistoia, completed in 1569 (494a); missing.

Temporarily in the church, from 1817-1851: two panels (wings) with St. George and Giovanni
Gualberto and St. Lawrence and St. Francis, workshop of Niccolo di Pietro Geriui, late 14th
century. Belonging to the painting of the Girdle Donation, then in the Academy; now in S.
Francesco in Arezzo (495). - Panel, St. Vincent Ferrer, on the predella three scenes from his
legend; attributed to Francesco Botticini or Giovan Francesco da Rimini, 2nd half of the 15th
century, now in the Academy, no. 3461 (496).

_Plastic._
Tomb or epitaph of Francesca Tornabuoni († 1477), by Verrocchio and his workshop, c. 1477ff.;
uncertain if executed; two marble reliefs depicting the death of Francesca in childbirth and the


delivery of the news of her death and the birth of her son to her husband Giovanni, by
Verrocchio, now in Museo Nazionale (Bargello), and four statues of virtues by Francesco di
Simone Ferrucci, now in Paris, Musee Jacquemart-Andre. Not identical with the tomb of F.
Tornabuoni in S. Maria sopra Minerva in Rome that was also destroyed (497).

Statue, terracotta, St. Peter the Martyr, in the style of Andrea della Robhia (?), dated 1484;
missing (498).

Marble crucifix, by Benvenuto Cellini, 1557 ff; intended for the master's planned tomb in S.
Maria Novella, then for SS. Annunziata; now in Madrid, Escorial (498a). Other artworks are
named on p. 758.

## UPPER CEMETERY

Burial niches (Avelli). Fresco painting, to be inferred from the miraculous image in the Cappella
della Pura, which escaped destruction.

On the portal by Gherardo Silvani (cf. p. 674) frescoes in the arched panels: outside, the
Presentation of the Virgin, inside two putti with the Manadori coat of arms; by Francesco
Montelatici called Cecco bravo, mid-17th century (499); removed when the portal was
demolished in 1847ff, remains now in the Museo dell'Opera di S. Croce.

## CLOISTER

Near the entrance: Large crucifix, between John and Mary, painted on wood. Restoration
inscription from 1613 (500); missing. –Oratorio of the confraternity of the Archangel Raphael
(501). Perhaps this was originally the triptych of the Archangel Raphael with Tobias and two St.
John, school of Castagno; traceable next to the church steps since 1790, now in the church, in the
fifth bay of the left side aisle, cf. there.
_Eastern wing._
Next to the church staircase, after 1565, remains of the tomb of Fra Jacopo Altoviti, Bishop of
Fiesole († 1430), missing; originally in the church in the second bay of the left aisle, cf. there
under lost decor.

In the third bay in the arched field formerly fresco, Expulsion from Paradise, work of Adam and
Eve, probably early work by Paolo Uccello, c. 1430/36; now removed and kept in the Capitolo
del Nocentino. In the fifth bay formerly frescoes, in the arched field the Flood, including Noah's
sacrifice of Thanksgiving and Shame, by Paolo Uccello, c. 1446; now detached and kept like the
previous fresco (cf. p.726f. and fn. 297).

```
Northern wing.
```

In the first bay on the altar, which is still there today, from about the 15th century until about
1937, the polyptych, Madonna with St., from the workshop of Bernardo Daddi, 1344; originally
and now again in the choral chapel of the Spanish chapel, cf. there.

_Spanish chapel._
Outside in the arched field of the door: Fresco of St. Dominic by Agostino Veracini, 18th century
(502); lost.

Inside. Choir chapel. The walls may have been decorated with frescoes referring to the Corpus
Domini (503); destroyed or painted over in 1592, when the current frescoes were created. First
altarpiece: the polyptych from the workshop of Bernardo Daddi, 1344, which is now back in this
place, cf. decor. Second panel: perhaps the former high altarpiece of the church, by Ugolino da
Siena (cf. lost decor of the church), placed here perhaps around 1430, removed at the end of the
18th century at the latest. Third panel: Last Supper, by Plautilla Nelli, 16th century; probably
here at the end of the 19th century until 1911 (504); now in the depot of the monastery of S.
Maria Novella.

**_Chiostro dei Morti._**
Above the earlier structural condition of the former cemetery, cf. p. 675 and p. 724.

Chapel of St. Anthony (no. 8). Patrons: Carboni; da Magnale. Frescoes. On the vault depictions
from the legend of St. Benedict (505); on the walls five arcades on pilasters, a human head, a
horse's head, remains of a chiaroscuro figure, an angel (?) with a sceptre or cane, in the central
arcade remains of another larger figure; 13th or 14th century (506); possibly two layers from
different periods on top of each other (507); lost. - In the tomb niche (Avello), fresco depiction of
Fuligno di. Carbone de' Galli da Campi, Bishop of Fiesole († 1349) (508); lost. - Altarpiece of
unknown origin, probably 14th century; still present in the 18th century (509); missing.

Chapel of St. Anne (no. 9). Patrons: da Quinto; Steccuti. Frescoes(?), 13th century: (?) (cf. note
506). -Altarpiece, depiction of St. Anne, St. Joachim and other saints (510); probably 2nd half of
the 14th century, lost. - On a tomb or foundation inscription of da Quinto from 1281 or 1291, cf.
note 53.

Chapel of St. Paul (no. 10). Patrons: Alberti; Betti. Frescoes, Life of St. Paul (?), 14th century
(511); identification uncertain. -Altarpiece, St. Paul, 14th century; still present in the 18th
century (512); missing.

St. Lawrence Chapel (no. 11). First dedicated to the apostles Simon and Taddeus under the
patronage of the confraternity of Gesù Pellegrino; then acquired by the Brunelleschi family and
dedicated to St. Lawrence; since 1474 again under the patronage of the aforementioned


confraternity (513). Demolished in the 19th century (see building history). Frescoes (?), already
whitewashed over in 1787 (513). - First altarpiece: unknown (Gesù Pellegrino?). Second panel:
St. Lawrence (under the patronage of Brunelleschi), removed in 1474; lost. Third panel: St.
Simon and St. Taddeus, missing (513). - Relief (terracotta ?), Gesù Pellegrino, added around
1474 (513); missing.

St. Martin's Chapel (no. 12). Already present in 1347 (1337 ?), under the patronage of the Nelli;
ceded to Agnolo di Zanobi Gaddi in 1446 (514); demolished in the 19th century (cf. building
history). Fresco, St. Martin; by Jacopo del Casentino; commissioned in 1347 (1337 ?), in the
18th century traces still preserved (515); lost.

Chapel of the Stigmata of St. Francis (no. 13). Patrons: Alfieri-Strinati. Founded in 1363 by
Francesco di Maso Alfieri; walled up in 1787 (516). Altarpiece, _Stigmatization of St. Francis_ ,
2nd half of the 14th century (?) (516); missing.

Oratory and rooms of the confraternity of Gesù Pellegrino (no. 14); already present in 1346 (cf.
note 513). In the cloister: frescoes, _Six depictions of the Life of Christ in Terra Verde_ , by
Donnino, Agnolo di Domenico and Domenico, 1505; a seventh fresco added in 1546; all
whitewashed over in 1749 (517); destroyed in the 19th century. Terracotta tabernacle on the
right, _Resurrection of Christ_ , by Luca della Robbia, mid-15th century; still present at the end of
the 18th century (518); lost. - In the vestibule, older altarpiece of the confraternity, triptych,
_Madonna with the Child and St. Philip, St. Zenobius and St. Simon,_ by Piero di Culliari or
Chiozzo, 1346; donated by Philippo Niccoli, Ser Ciuto Cecchi, Piero Rinaldi and others; still
present in the 18th century (519), missing. - The panel, _St. Laurentius_ , from the Laurentius
Chapel, was also there for a time, cf. above. - Crucifix painted on the altar in the oratory, donated
by the Remigi Malefici, 1412 (520); missing. - In the sacristy, wooden crucifix by Baccio da
Montelupo, now in the Cappella della Pura, cf. there. - Numerous smaller furnishings (521) -
Jacopo del Casentino painted _“La storia di S. Martino”_ , according to the will of Nello Sparzi
from 1437 (521a); lost.
Chapel of St. Benedict (no. 18). Patron: Tornaquinci. Built before 1310 by order of Ruggiero de'
Tornaquinci; Giovanni di Messer Ruggiero, who died in 1313, was buried there (522). Frescoes,
_Scenes from the legend of St. Benedict_ , 14th century (?); traces still preserved in 1787 (522); lost.

- Stone relief, Ecce homo, now on the north wall of the Chiostro dei Morti, cf. p. 725. Two
figured tombstones, including that of Prior Giovanni di Messer Ruggiero Tornaquinci († 1313)
(522); missing.

Chapel of St. Philip and St. James (no. 23). Patrons: Tornaquinci-Popoleschi; allegedly built in
1349 by Niccolo di Gino and Tommaso di Piero Tornaquinci (rebuilt ?); granted to the
Confraternity of the Annunziata in 1657, mortuary in 1787 (523). Altarpiece of unknown origin,


parts with St. Philip and St. James, St. Jerome and St. Dominic, 2nd half of the 14th century (?);
still preserved at the end of the 18th century (523); missing.

Chapel of St. Thomas Aquinas (no. 24). Patrons: Amieri (524). Remains of the decoration, fresco
with St. Thomas Aquinas, preserved, cf. p. 725 and note 329.

Chapel of St. Joseph (No. 25). In the 15th century under the patronage of the Zimmerman
Confraternity. In the 17th century with the Chapel of St. Thomas, bath- and shaving room of the
monks (525) Frescoes, _Legends of St. Joseph_ , 15th century (525); lost.

The Strozzi Chapel (No. 6) dedicated to Annunciation of the Virgin Mary; Patron:
Strozzi-Trinciavelli; cf. fn. 332. Altarpiece, 1787 still not removed for long (526); missing.

On the altar of Chiostro dei Morti: Fresco, _Resurrection of Christ_ by Lodovico Cigoli, last fourth
of the 16th century (527); lost. –Marble statue of St. Bishop Dionysius in the middle of the
courtyard; restoration inscription from 1654; originally elsewhere (528); missing.

**_Refectory (No. 35)_**
Frescoes (?) after testamentary provision of Fra Jacopo Passavanti († 1357); uncertain if
executed.

Fresco or altarpiece, _Last Supper_ by Andrea del Castagno (?), Middle of the 15th century (530);
missing. –Depiction of renowned cloister occupants (531); missing. –Depictions of saints (531);
not identified. Twelve oval pictures, _Apostle_ by Lorenzo Lippi, first half of the 17th century
(521); not identified. Painting, _Madonna between saints_ , by Bernardino Poccetti, end of the 16th
century (532); missing.

_Capitolo del Nocentino (No. 34)_
Built 1303/08 (cf. fn. 56). Granted by the confraternity dei SS. Innocenti in 1466 (533). First
decoration: Altar tabernacle with putti decorated consoles; 14th (?) century (534); missing. In
there, _Altarpiece of the Bethlehem infanticide_ ; attributed to Botticelli or Fra Angelico, likely in
the style of Fra Filippo Lippi, 15th century; removed at the end of the 18th century (535);
missing. –Second decoration: Marble relief, _Madonna with child,_ attributed to Mino da Fiesole,
second half of the 15th century.; positioned by the repeal of the confraternity at the place of the
altarpiece, originated from the house of Ascanio Bitti (Guiducci) (536); missing.

**Chiostro Grande and extensions.**
_Court._
In the middle was once a statue of the blessed John from Salerno, by Girolamo (?) Ticciati, 1735;
now in Chiostro dei Morti on the western wall, cf. there.


_Loggia._
Frescoes (maybe on the now empty wall panels), _Legends of St. Hyacinth_ by Andrea Boscoli,
end of the 16th century; _Death of St. Peter the Martyr_ by Lorenzo dello Sciorina, end of the 16th
century (537); lost.

_Lower dormitory in the northern wing._
Painting (Canvas), Annunciation with many saints by Fra Angelico, 15th century; originally
organ wing, cf. p. 736, here c. 1790 (538); missing. –Painting, _Crucifixion with St. Magdalena
and the good chessman_ by Giovanni Battista Isabelli, 1577 (539); missing. –Painting, _Madonna
with St. Dominic_ by a good student of Allori, beginning of the 17th century (?) (540); missing.
–Frescoes, _Series of popes and cardinals of the Dominican order_ , shortly before 1689 (541);
perhaps lost.

_Library in the upper floor of the northern wing_
Built by Matteo Nigetti, 1629 (cf. fn. 80). Large gilded bookshelves on the walls (542); lost.
–Many large paintings with Dominican saints on the narrow sides, on the long sides are fourteen
eight-sided paintings with renowned writers of the cloister, some by Jacopo Vignali, c. 1629; two
oval paintings with saints of the order (545); missing. – _Tondo with Birth of Christ_ , style of Pietro
Perugino (?), 15th century (?) (543). –Arched field with a depiction of St. Thomas of Aquinas by
Franciabigio, beginning of the 16th century (544); destroyed or missing.
In 1836, neither books nor paintings were available (546).

```
Pope’s Apartment in the western wing
```
At the lowest post of the staircase leading up (see above p. 676) stone figure of the "Marzocco",
the heraldic lion of Florence, by Donatello, 1418/21; now in the Museo Nazionale (Bargello)
(547). Decor from 1419 (for Pope Martin V): the pope's bedroom decorated in green, the
adjoining room with a floral pattern (548). For the great hall, Nanni di Banco supplied two
shields with the coat of arms of the wool weavers' guild (549). All lost or missing.

In 1503/04, Leonardo da Vinci designed his board for the fresco of the Battle of Anghiari here
(550).

Decor from 1515 (for Pope Leo X): the great hall was painted by Ridolfo del Ghirlandaio (551);
lost.

In the chapel, end of the 19th century, replaced fresco, round, _Madonna with Child_ , style of
Masolino, 15th century (552); missing.


_Chapel of St. Nicholas (Nr. 40)_
Patron: Acciaiuoli. Founded by Dardano Acciaiuoli in 1332 and dedicated to St. Nicholas of
Bari; Reverted to the monastery in 1465; Burned out shortly before 1545; Since 1689 under the
patronage of the Palafrenieri confraternity and consecrated by them to St. Anne; added to the
apothecary in 1848 (553).
Frescoes, _Legend of St. Nicholas of Bari_ , by Spinello Aretino (or Mariotto di Nardo?), before
1405 (554); damaged in the fire of 1545, whitewashed over in 1718 (555). - Marble tomb slab
with relief figure for Dardano Acciaiuoli († 1334) (556); lost. - Marble tomb slab with relief
figure for Leone Acciaiuoli († 1405), by Niccolo di Piero Lamberti, 1405/08 (557); lost. -
Stained glass, by Fra Bernardo di Stefano, 1413 (558); lost. - Four paintings by the confraternity
della Crocetta called dei Tessitori (559); missing.
Sacristy. Chair, commissioned by the wool weavers' guild to Manno di Benincasa called dei Cori
in 1408 (560); lost. - Stained glass, by Niccolo di Piero, 1405/07 (561); lost.

_Apothecary rooms (No. 39)._
Founded around 1612. At times the St. Nicholas chapel was also used.
In the first room: stucco ceiling, 17th century (?); wooden cupboards, partly gilded; apothecary
vessels (562). Oval painting set into a cupboard, Betrothal of St. Catherine, by Francesco
Salviati, mid-16th century (562); missing.
In the second room: Medici coat of arms made of house stone, in the shield the painted portrait
of St. Peter Martyr, by Matteo Rosselli, 1st half of the 17th century (563); missing. - _Three
Bozzetti_ by Marucelli, a sketch by Lodovico Cigoli, late 16th century, a marble bust of Fra
Tommaso Valori, by Giuseppe Spedolo from Treviso, inscribed and dated 1825 (564); all
missing.

In the other rooms: four paintings with scenes from the Holy Scriptures, including the visit of the
three angels to Abraham and the story of Balaam's donkey, by Francesco Curradi, 1st half of the
17th century (566); missing. - Painting, _the Holy Family_ , by Francesco Brina, mid
16th century; still present around 1870 (565); missing. - Painting, _Holy Trinity_ , by Matteo
Rosselli, 1st half of the 17th century (567); missing.
In a small anteroom: fresco of unknown subject, by Giuseppe Romei, 2nd half of the 18th
century (567); lost.

_Infirmary (No. 37)_
Altarpiece, _Pietà_ by Lodovico Cigoli, end of the 16th century (568); missing.

_Novitiate in the upper floor of the southern wing_
Here temporarily (end of the 18th century and later) Panel painting, _Madonna with Saints_ by
Michele Tosini (?), second half of the 16th century (?) (569); missing. Above a cell door,


painting, _Portrait of Alessio Strozzi_ by Santi di Tito, second half of the 16th century (570);
missing.

_Rooms of the Confraternity of St. Laurentius “al Palco”_
In the upper floor above the passageway between Chiostro Grande and Chiostro Verde, since
1365 (571). Altarpiece of unknown object by Ghirlandaio, second half of the 15th century (572);
missing.

_Rooms of the Confraternity della Scala_
In the vicinity of the entrance of the cloister, since 1540; exact location unknown (573).
Anteroom. On the right, painting, _Crucifixion with the Virgin Mary, John, and Magdalena_ by
Lorenzo Lippi, first half of the 17th century.; missing. Across from that, painting, _Tobias heals
his father_ by Orazio Fidani, 17th century; missing (574).
Oratory. Outside above the entrance door, painting, Children before the Mother of God by
Francesco Curradi, first half of the 17th century (575); missing. Inside painting, Enthroned
Madonna with child and four angels between St. Dominic and St. Jerome, end of the 15th
century (576); missing. On the singer tribune, painting, _Archangel Raphael_ by Carlo Dolci,
middle of the 17th century (577); missing.
Sacristy. Painting, _Christ_ by Lorenzo Lippi, first half of the 17th century (578); missing.

**_At an unspecified location
in the church or the cloister_**
Altarpiece, _Enthroned Madonna with Child and angels between St. Dominic, St. John the
Baptist, St. Paul and St. Lawrence (standing) and St. Peter Martyr and St. Thomas Aquinas
(kneeling), next to St. Peter Martyr and recommended by him a kneeling nun as donor_ ; from the
workshop of Agnolo Gaddi, dated 1375 (disputed); now in the Parma Gallery; no. 435 (579).
Figured stone plinth, mid-13th century, now in the Musco Nazionale (Bargello) (580); in the
center a short column with an early Gothic bud capital, at the corners St. Peter, St. Paul and two
monks. The base apparently once supported a column, perhaps on a tabernacle. - Gothic stone
tabernacle for an altar or a tomb; in the pediment Salvator mundi, on the side posts the statuettes
of the Annunciation; 14th century; now in the Musco Nazionale (Bargello) (581). - Marble statue
of a bishop, type of Tino di Camaino, 1st half of the 14th century; now in the Museo Nazionale
(Bargello) (582).
